Illinois, session 104th, HB1836.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as the Clean Slate 5Act.  6    Section 5. The Criminal Identification Act is amended by 7changing Sections 2.1, 5.2, 13, and 14 and by adding Section 85.3 as follows: 9    (20 ILCS 2630/2.1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 206-2.1)10    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-5)11    Sec. 2.1. For the purpose of maintaining complete and 12accurate criminal records of the Illinois State Police, it is 13necessary for all policing bodies of this State, the clerk of 14the circuit court, the Illinois Department of Corrections, the 15sheriff of each county, and State's Attorney of each county to 16submit certain criminal arrest, charge, and disposition 17information to the Illinois State Police for filing at the 18earliest time possible. Unless otherwise noted herein, it 19shall be the duty of all policing bodies of this State, the 20clerk of the circuit court, the Illinois Department of 21Corrections, the sheriff of each county, and the State's 22Attorney of each county to report such information as provided   HB1836 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1in this Section, both in the form and manner required by the 2Illinois State Police and within 30 days of the criminal 3history event. Specifically:4        (a) Arrest Information. All agencies making arrests 5    for offenses which are required by statute to be 6    collected, maintained or disseminated by the Illinois 7    State Police shall be responsible for furnishing daily to 8    the Illinois State Police fingerprints, charges and 9    descriptions of all persons who are arrested for such 10    offenses. All such agencies shall also notify the Illinois 11    State Police of all decisions by the arresting agency not 12    to refer such arrests for prosecution. With approval of 13    the Illinois State Police, an agency making such arrests 14    may enter into arrangements with other agencies for the 15    purpose of furnishing daily such fingerprints, charges and 16    descriptions to the Illinois State Police upon its behalf.17        (b) Charge Information. The State's Attorney of each 18    county shall notify the Illinois State Police of all 19    charges filed and all petitions filed alleging that a 20    minor is delinquent, including all those added subsequent 21    to the filing of a case, and whether charges were not filed 22    in cases for which the Illinois State Police has received 23    information required to be reported pursuant to paragraph 24    (a) of this Section. With approval of the Illinois State 25    Police, the State's Attorney may enter into arrangements 26    with other agencies for the purpose of furnishing the   HB1836 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    information required by this subsection (b) to the 2    Illinois State Police upon the State's Attorney's behalf.3        (c) Disposition Information. The clerk of the circuit 4    court of each county shall furnish the Illinois State 5    Police, in the form and manner required by the Supreme 6    Court, with all final dispositions of cases for which the 7    Illinois State Police has received information required to 8    be reported pursuant to paragraph (a) or (d) of this 9    Section. Such information shall include, for each charge, 10    all (1) judgments of not guilty, judgments of guilty 11    including the sentence pronounced by the court with 12    statutory citations to the relevant sentencing provision, 13    findings that a minor is delinquent and any sentence made 14    based on those findings, discharges and dismissals in the 15    court; (2) reviewing court orders filed with the clerk of 16    the circuit court which reverse or remand a reported 17    conviction or findings that a minor is delinquent or that 18    vacate or modify a sentence or sentence made following a 19    trial that a minor is delinquent; (3) continuances to a 20    date certain in furtherance of an order of supervision 21    granted under Section 5-6-1 of the Unified Code of 22    Corrections or an order of probation granted under Section 23    10 of the Cannabis Control Act, Section 410 of the 24    Illinois Controlled Substances Act, Section 70 of the 25    Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, 26    Section 12-4.3 or subdivision (b)(1) of Section 12-3.05 of   HB1836 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 2    Section 10-102 of the Illinois Alcoholism and Other Drug 3    Dependency Act, Section 40-10 of the Substance Use 4    Disorder Act, Section 10 of the Steroid Control Act, or 5    Section 5-615 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987; and (4) 6    judgments or court orders terminating or revoking a 7    sentence to or juvenile disposition of probation, 8    supervision or conditional discharge and any resentencing 9    or new court orders entered by a juvenile court relating 10    to the disposition of a minor's case involving delinquency 11    after such revocation.12        (d) Fingerprints After Sentencing.13            (1) After the court pronounces sentence, sentences 14        a minor following a trial in which a minor was found to 15        be delinquent or issues an order of supervision or an 16        order of probation granted under Section 10 of the 17        Cannabis Control Act, Section 410 of the Illinois 18        Controlled Substances Act, Section 70 of the 19        Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, 20        Section 12-4.3 or subdivision (b)(1) of Section 21        12-3.05 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal 22        Code of 2012, Section 10-102 of the Illinois 23        Alcoholism and Other Drug Dependency Act, Section 24        40-10 of the Substance Use Disorder Act, Section 10 of 25        the Steroid Control Act, or Section 5-615 of the 26        Juvenile Court Act of 1987 for any offense which is   HB1836 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        required by statute to be collected, maintained, or 2        disseminated by the Illinois State Police, the State's 3        Attorney of each county shall ask the court to order a 4        law enforcement agency to fingerprint immediately all 5        persons appearing before the court who have not 6        previously been fingerprinted for the same case. The 7        court shall so order the requested fingerprinting, if 8        it determines that any such person has not previously 9        been fingerprinted for the same case. The law 10        enforcement agency shall submit such fingerprints to 11        the Illinois State Police daily.12            (2) After the court pronounces sentence or makes a 13        disposition of a case following a finding of 14        delinquency for any offense which is not required by 15        statute to be collected, maintained, or disseminated 16        by the Illinois State Police, the prosecuting attorney 17        may ask the court to order a law enforcement agency to 18        fingerprint immediately all persons appearing before 19        the court who have not previously been fingerprinted 20        for the same case. The court may so order the requested 21        fingerprinting, if it determines that any so sentenced 22        person has not previously been fingerprinted for the 23        same case. The law enforcement agency may retain such 24        fingerprints in its files.25        (e) Corrections Information. The Illinois Department 26    of Corrections and the sheriff of each county shall   HB1836 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    furnish the Illinois State Police with all information 2    concerning the receipt, escape, execution, death, release, 3    pardon, parole, commutation of sentence, granting of 4    executive clemency or discharge of an individual who has 5    been sentenced or committed to the agency's custody for 6    any offenses which are mandated by statute to be 7    collected, maintained or disseminated by the Illinois 8    State Police. For an individual who has been charged with 9    any such offense and who escapes from custody or dies 10    while in custody, all information concerning the receipt 11    and escape or death, whichever is appropriate, shall also 12    be so furnished to the Illinois State Police.13(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 14    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-5)15    Sec. 2.1. For the purpose of maintaining complete and 16accurate criminal records of the Illinois State Police, it is 17necessary for all policing bodies of this State, the clerk of 18the circuit court, the Illinois Department of Corrections, the 19sheriff of each county, and State's Attorney of each county to 20submit certain criminal arrest, charge, and disposition 21information to the Illinois State Police for filing at the 22earliest time possible. Unless otherwise noted herein, it 23shall be the duty of all policing bodies of this State, the 24clerk of the circuit court, the Illinois Department of 25Corrections, the sheriff of each county, and the State's   HB1836 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1Attorney of each county to report such information as provided 2in this Section, both in the form and manner required by the 3Illinois State Police and within 30 days of the criminal 4history event. Specifically:5        (a) Arrest Information. All agencies making arrests 6    for offenses which are required by statute to be 7    collected, maintained or disseminated by the Illinois 8    State Police shall be responsible for furnishing daily to 9    the Illinois State Police fingerprints, charges and 10    descriptions of all persons who are arrested for such 11    offenses. All such agencies shall also notify the Illinois 12    State Police of all decisions by the arresting agency not 13    to refer such arrests for prosecution. With approval of 14    the Illinois State Police, an agency making such arrests 15    may enter into arrangements with other agencies for the 16    purpose of furnishing daily such fingerprints, charges and 17    descriptions to the Illinois State Police upon its behalf.18        (b) Charge Information. The State's Attorney of each 19    county shall notify the Illinois State Police of all 20    charges filed and all petitions filed alleging that a 21    minor is delinquent, including all those added subsequent 22    to the filing of a case, and whether charges were not filed 23    in cases for which the Illinois State Police has received 24    information required to be reported pursuant to paragraph 25    (a) of this Section. With approval of the Illinois State 26    Police, the State's Attorney may enter into arrangements   HB1836 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    with other agencies for the purpose of furnishing the 2    information required by this subsection (b) to the 3    Illinois State Police upon the State's Attorney's behalf.4        (c) Disposition Information. The clerk of the circuit 5    court of each county shall furnish the Illinois State 6    Police, in the form and manner required by the Supreme 7    Court, with all final dispositions of cases for which the 8    Illinois State Police has received information required to 9    be reported pursuant to paragraph (a) or (d) of this 10    Section. Such information shall include, for each charge, 11    all (1) judgments of not guilty, judgments of guilty 12    including the sentence pronounced by the court with 13    statutory citations to the relevant sentencing provision, 14    findings that a minor is delinquent and any sentence made 15    based on those findings, discharges and dismissals in the 16    court; (2) reviewing court orders filed with the clerk of 17    the circuit court which reverse or remand a reported 18    conviction or findings that a minor is delinquent or that 19    vacate or modify a sentence or sentence made following a 20    trial that a minor is delinquent; (3) continuances to a 21    date certain in furtherance of an order of supervision 22    granted under Section 5-6-1 of the Unified Code of 23    Corrections or an order of probation granted under Section 24    10 of the Cannabis Control Act, Section 410 of the 25    Illinois Controlled Substances Act, Section 70 of the 26    Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act,   HB1836 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    Section 12-4.3 or subdivision (b)(1) of Section 12-3.05 of 2    the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 3    Section 10-102 of the Illinois Alcoholism and Other Drug 4    Dependency Act, Section 40-10 of the Substance Use 5    Disorder Act, Section 10 of the Steroid Control Act, or 6    Section 5-615 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987; (4) 7    judgments or court orders terminating or revoking a 8    sentence to or juvenile disposition of probation, 9    supervision or conditional discharge, judgment or court 10    orders of discharge from probation or conditional 11    discharge, and any resentencing or new court orders 12    entered by a juvenile court relating to the disposition of 13    a minor's case involving delinquency after such 14    revocation; and (5) in any case in which a firearm is 15    alleged to have been used in the commission of an offense, 16    the serial number of any firearm involved in the case, or 17    if the serial number was obliterated, as provided by the 18    State's Attorney to the clerk of the circuit court at the 19    time of disposition. The Illinois State Police may provide 20    reports of cases with missing disposition information to 21    the clerk of the circuit court. Each clerk of the circuit 22    court receiving a report of cases with missing disposition 23    information shall respond within 30 days after receiving 24    the report unless the volume of records in the report 25    renders that timeline impracticable. 26        (d) Fingerprints After Sentencing.  HB1836 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1            (1) After the court pronounces sentence, sentences 2        a minor following a trial in which a minor was found to 3        be delinquent or issues an order of supervision or an 4        order of probation granted under Section 10 of the 5        Cannabis Control Act, Section 410 of the Illinois 6        Controlled Substances Act, Section 70 of the 7        Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, 8        Section 12-4.3 or subdivision (b)(1) of Section 9        12-3.05 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal 10        Code of 2012, Section 10-102 of the Illinois 11        Alcoholism and Other Drug Dependency Act, Section 12        40-10 of the Substance Use Disorder Act, Section 10 of 13        the Steroid Control Act, or Section 5-615 of the 14        Juvenile Court Act of 1987 for any offense which is 15        required by statute to be collected, maintained, or 16        disseminated by the Illinois State Police, the State's 17        Attorney of each county shall ask the court to order a 18        law enforcement agency to fingerprint immediately all 19        persons appearing before the court who have not 20        previously been fingerprinted for the same case. The 21        court shall so order the requested fingerprinting, if 22        it determines that any such person has not previously 23        been fingerprinted for the same case. The law 24        enforcement agency shall submit such fingerprints to 25        the Illinois State Police daily.26            (2) After the court pronounces sentence or makes a   HB1836 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        disposition of a case following a finding of 2        delinquency for any offense which is not required by 3        statute to be collected, maintained, or disseminated 4        by the Illinois State Police, the prosecuting attorney 5        may ask the court to order a law enforcement agency to 6        fingerprint immediately all persons appearing before 7        the court who have not previously been fingerprinted 8        for the same case. The court may so order the requested 9        fingerprinting, if it determines that any so sentenced 10        person has not previously been fingerprinted for the 11        same case. The law enforcement agency may retain such 12        fingerprints in its files.13        (e) Corrections Information. The Illinois Department 14    of Corrections and the sheriff of each county shall 15    furnish the Illinois State Police with all information 16    concerning the receipt, escape, execution, death, release, 17    pardon, parole, commutation of sentence, granting of 18    executive clemency or discharge of an individual who has 19    been sentenced or committed to the agency's custody for 20    any offenses which are mandated by statute to be 21    collected, maintained or disseminated by the Illinois 22    State Police. For an individual who has been charged with 23    any such offense and who escapes from custody or dies 24    while in custody, all information concerning the receipt 25    and escape or death, whichever is appropriate, shall also 26    be so furnished to the Illinois State Police.  HB1836 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        (f) Any entity required to report information 2    concerning criminal arrests, charges, and dispositions 3    pursuant to Section 2.1 or 5 of this Act shall respond to 4    any notice advising the entity of missing or incomplete 5    information or an error in the reporting of the 6    information as follows:7            (1) Responses shall be made within 30 days after 8        the notice from the Illinois State Police unless the 9        volume of records in the report renders that timeline 10        impracticable.11            (2) Responses shall include the missing or 12        incomplete information, correction of the error or an 13        explanation detailing the reason the information 14        cannot be provided or corrected, and an estimated 15        timeframe for compliance. 16(Source: P.A. 104-5, eff. 1-1-26.) 17    (20 ILCS 2630/5.2)18    Sec. 5.2. Expungement, sealing, and immediate sealing.19    (a) General Provisions.20        (1) Definitions. In this Act, words and phrases have 21    the meanings set forth in this subsection, except when a 22    particular context clearly requires a different meaning.23            (A) The following terms shall have the meanings 24        ascribed to them in the following Sections of the 25        Unified Code of Corrections:  HB1836 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1                Business Offense, Section 5-1-2.2                Charge, Section 5-1-3.3                Court, Section 5-1-6.4                Defendant, Section 5-1-7.5                Felony, Section 5-1-9.6                Imprisonment, Section 5-1-10.7                Judgment, Section 5-1-12.8                Misdemeanor, Section 5-1-14.9                Offense, Section 5-1-15.10                Parole, Section 5-1-16.11                Petty Offense, Section 5-1-17.12                Probation, Section 5-1-18.13                Sentence, Section 5-1-19.14                Supervision, Section 5-1-21.15                Victim, Section 5-1-22.16            (B) As used in this Section, "charge not initiated 17        by arrest" means a charge (as defined by Section 5-1-3 18        of the Unified Code of Corrections) brought against a 19        defendant where the defendant is not arrested prior to 20        or as a direct result of the charge.21            (C) "Conviction" means a judgment of conviction or 22        sentence entered upon a plea of guilty or upon a 23        verdict or finding of guilty of an offense, rendered 24        by a legally constituted jury or by a court of 25        competent jurisdiction authorized to try the case 26        without a jury. An order of supervision successfully   HB1836 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        completed by the petitioner is not a conviction. An 2        order of qualified probation (as defined in subsection 3        (a)(1)(J)) successfully completed by the petitioner is 4        not a conviction. An order of supervision or an order 5        of qualified probation that is terminated 6        unsatisfactorily is a conviction, unless the 7        unsatisfactory termination is reversed, vacated, or 8        modified and the judgment of conviction, if any, is 9        reversed or vacated.10            (D) "Criminal offense" means a petty offense, 11        business offense, misdemeanor, felony, or municipal 12        ordinance violation (as defined in subsection 13        (a)(1)(H)). As used in this Section, a minor traffic 14        offense (as defined in subsection (a)(1)(G)) shall not 15        be considered a criminal offense.16            (E) "Expunge" means to physically destroy the 17        records or return them to the petitioner and to 18        obliterate the petitioner's name from any official 19        index or public record, or both. Nothing in this Act 20        shall require the physical destruction of the circuit 21        court file, but such records relating to arrests or 22        charges, or both, ordered expunged shall be impounded 23        as required by subsections (d)(9)(A)(ii) and 24        (d)(9)(B)(ii).25            (F) As used in this Section, "last sentence" means 26        the sentence, order of supervision, or order of   HB1836 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        qualified probation (as defined by subsection 2        (a)(1)(J)), for a criminal offense (as defined by 3        subsection (a)(1)(D)) that terminates last in time in 4        any jurisdiction, regardless of whether the petitioner 5        has included the criminal offense for which the 6        sentence or order of supervision or qualified 7        probation was imposed in his or her petition. If 8        multiple sentences, orders of supervision, or orders 9        of qualified probation terminate on the same day and 10        are last in time, they shall be collectively 11        considered the "last sentence" regardless of whether 12        they were ordered to run concurrently.13            (G) "Minor traffic offense" means a petty offense, 14        business offense, or Class C misdemeanor under the 15        Illinois Vehicle Code or a similar provision of a 16        municipal or local ordinance.17            (G-5) "Minor Cannabis Offense" means a violation 18        of Section 4 or 5 of the Cannabis Control Act 19        concerning not more than 30 grams of any substance 20        containing cannabis, provided the violation did not 21        include a penalty enhancement under Section 7 of the 22        Cannabis Control Act and is not associated with an 23        arrest, conviction or other disposition for a violent 24        crime as defined in subsection (c) of Section 3 of the 25        Rights of Crime Victims and Witnesses Act. 26            (H) "Municipal ordinance violation" means an   HB1836 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        offense defined by a municipal or local ordinance that 2        is criminal in nature and with which the petitioner 3        was charged or for which the petitioner was arrested 4        and released without charging.5            (I) "Petitioner" means an adult or a minor 6        prosecuted as an adult who has applied for relief 7        under this Section.8            (J) "Qualified probation" means an order of 9        probation under Section 10 of the Cannabis Control 10        Act, Section 410 of the Illinois Controlled Substances 11        Act, Section 70 of the Methamphetamine Control and 12        Community Protection Act, Section 5-6-3.3 or 5-6-3.4 13        of the Unified Code of Corrections, Section 14        12-4.3(b)(1) and (2) of the Criminal Code of 1961 (as 15        those provisions existed before their deletion by 16        Public Act 89-313), Section 10-102 of the Illinois 17        Alcoholism and Other Drug Dependency Act, Section 18        40-10 of the Substance Use Disorder Act, or Section 10 19        of the Steroid Control Act. For the purpose of this 20        Section, "successful completion" of an order of 21        qualified probation under Section 10-102 of the 22        Illinois Alcoholism and Other Drug Dependency Act and 23        Section 40-10 of the Substance Use Disorder Act means 24        that the probation was terminated satisfactorily and 25        the judgment of conviction was vacated.26            (K) (i) Except as provided in subdivision (ii),   HB1836 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        "seal" "Seal" means to physically and electronically 2        maintain the records, unless the records would 3        otherwise be destroyed due to age, but to make the 4        records unavailable without a court order, subject to 5        the exceptions in Sections 12 and 13 of this Act. The 6        petitioner's name shall also be obliterated from the 7        official index required to be kept by the circuit 8        court clerk under Section 16 of the Clerks of Courts 9        Act, but any index issued by the circuit court clerk 10        before the entry of the order to seal shall not be 11        affected.12            (ii) For records subject to relief under 13        subsection (k) of this Section, "seal" means to 14        physically and electronically maintain the records, 15        unless the records would otherwise be destroyed due to 16        age, but to have the records impounded, as defined in 17        paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Section 5 of the 18        Court Record and Document Accessibility Act. The 19        defendant's name shall also be obliterated from the 20        official index required to be kept by the circuit 21        court clerk under Section 16 of the Clerks of Courts 22        Act. Upon request, and without court order, the 23        circuit court clerk shall provide to the Illinois 24        State Police the disposition information for any 25        record that was ordered to be sealed or impounded 26        pursuant to this Section.   HB1836 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1            (L) "Sexual offense committed against a minor" 2        includes, but is not limited to, the offenses of 3        indecent solicitation of a child or criminal sexual 4        abuse when the victim of such offense is under 18 years 5        of age.6            (M) "Terminate" as it relates to a sentence or 7        order of supervision or qualified probation includes 8        either satisfactory or unsatisfactory termination of 9        the sentence, unless otherwise specified in this 10        Section. A sentence is terminated notwithstanding any 11        outstanding financial legal obligation. 12        (2) Minor Traffic Offenses. Orders of supervision or 13    convictions for minor traffic offenses shall not affect a 14    petitioner's eligibility to expunge or seal records 15    pursuant to this Section.16        (2.5) Commencing 180 days after July 29, 2016 (the 17    effective date of Public Act 99-697), the law enforcement 18    agency issuing the citation shall automatically expunge, 19    on or before January 1 and July 1 of each year, the law 20    enforcement records of a person found to have committed a 21    civil law violation of subsection (a) of Section 4 of the 22    Cannabis Control Act or subsection (c) of Section 3.5 of 23    the Drug Paraphernalia Control Act in the law enforcement 24    agency's possession or control and which contains the 25    final satisfactory disposition which pertain to the person 26    issued a citation for that offense. The law enforcement   HB1836 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    agency shall provide by rule the process for access, 2    review, and to confirm the automatic expungement by the 3    law enforcement agency issuing the citation. Commencing 4    180 days after July 29, 2016 (the effective date of Public 5    Act 99-697), the clerk of the circuit court shall expunge, 6    upon order of the court, or in the absence of a court order 7    on or before January 1 and July 1 of each year, the court 8    records of a person found in the circuit court to have 9    committed a civil law violation of subsection (a) of 10    Section 4 of the Cannabis Control Act or subsection (c) of 11    Section 3.5 of the Drug Paraphernalia Control Act in the 12    clerk's possession or control and which contains the final 13    satisfactory disposition which pertain to the person 14    issued a citation for any of those offenses. 15        (3) Exclusions. Except as otherwise provided in 16    subsections (b)(5), (b)(6), (b)(8), (e), (e-5), and (e-6) 17    of this Section, the court shall not order:18            (A) the sealing or expungement of the records of 19        arrests or charges not initiated by arrest that result 20        in an order of supervision for or conviction of: (i) 21        any sexual offense committed against a minor; (ii) 22        Section 11-501 of the Illinois Vehicle Code or a 23        similar provision of a local ordinance; or (iii) 24        Section 11-503 of the Illinois Vehicle Code or a 25        similar provision of a local ordinance, unless the 26        arrest or charge is for a misdemeanor violation of   HB1836 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        subsection (a) of Section 11-503 or a similar 2        provision of a local ordinance, that occurred prior to 3        the offender reaching the age of 25 years and the 4        offender has no other conviction for violating Section 5        11-501 or 11-503 of the Illinois Vehicle Code or a 6        similar provision of a local ordinance.7            (B) the sealing or expungement of records of minor 8        traffic offenses (as defined in subsection (a)(1)(G)), 9        unless the petitioner was arrested and released 10        without charging.11            (C) the sealing of the records of arrests or 12        charges not initiated by arrest which result in an 13        order of supervision or a conviction for the following 14        offenses:15                (i) offenses included in Article 11 of the 16            Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 17            or a similar provision of a local ordinance, 18            except Section 11-14 and a misdemeanor violation 19            of Section 11-30 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or 20            the Criminal Code of 2012, or a similar provision 21            of a local ordinance;22                (ii) Section 11-1.50, 12-3.4, 12-15, 12-30, 23            26-5, or 48-1 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 24            Criminal Code of 2012, or a similar provision of a 25            local ordinance;26                (iii) Section 12-3.1 or 12-3.2 of the Criminal   HB1836 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1            Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or 2            Section 125 of the Stalking No Contact Order Act, 3            or Section 219 of the Civil No Contact Order Act, 4            or a similar provision of a local ordinance;5                (iv) Class A misdemeanors or felony offenses 6            under the Humane Care for Animals Act; or7                (v) any offense or attempted offense that 8            would subject a person to registration under the 9            Sex Offender Registration Act.10            (D) (blank).11    (b) Expungement.12        (1) A petitioner may petition the circuit court to 13    expunge the records of his or her arrests and charges not 14    initiated by arrest when each arrest or charge not 15    initiated by arrest sought to be expunged resulted in: (i) 16    acquittal, dismissal, or the petitioner's release without 17    charging, unless excluded by subsection (a)(3)(B); (ii) a 18    conviction which was vacated or reversed, unless excluded 19    by subsection (a)(3)(B); (iii) an order of supervision and 20    such supervision was successfully completed by the 21    petitioner, unless excluded by subsection (a)(3)(A) or 22    (a)(3)(B); or (iv) an order of qualified probation (as 23    defined in subsection (a)(1)(J)) and such probation was 24    successfully completed by the petitioner.25        (1.5) When a petitioner seeks to have a record of 26    arrest expunged under this Section, and the petitioner   HB1836 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    offender has been convicted of a criminal offense, the 2    State's Attorney may object to the expungement on the 3    grounds that the records contain specific relevant 4    information aside from the mere fact of the arrest. 5        (2) Time frame for filing a petition to expunge.6            (A) When the arrest or charge not initiated by 7        arrest sought to be expunged resulted in an acquittal, 8        dismissal, the petitioner's release without charging, 9        or the reversal or vacation of a conviction, there is 10        no waiting period to petition for the expungement of 11        such records.12            (A-5) In anticipation of the successful completion 13        of a problem-solving court, pre-plea diversion, or 14        post-plea diversion program, a petition for 15        expungement may be filed 61 days before the 16        anticipated dismissal of the case or any time 17        thereafter. Upon successful completion of the program 18        and dismissal of the case, the court shall review the 19        petition of the person graduating from the program and 20        shall grant expungement if the petitioner meets all 21        requirements as specified in any applicable statute. 22            (B) When the arrest or charge not initiated by 23        arrest sought to be expunged resulted in an order of 24        supervision, successfully completed by the petitioner, 25        the following time frames will apply:26                (i) Those arrests or charges that resulted in   HB1836 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1            orders of supervision under Section 3-707, 3-708, 2            3-710, or 5-401.3 of the Illinois Vehicle Code or 3            a similar provision of a local ordinance, or under 4            Section 11-1.50, 12-3.2, or 12-15 of the Criminal 5            Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or a 6            similar provision of a local ordinance, shall not 7            be eligible for expungement until 5 years have 8            passed following the satisfactory termination of 9            the supervision.10                (i-5) Those arrests or charges that resulted 11            in orders of supervision for a misdemeanor 12            violation of subsection (a) of Section 11-503 of 13            the Illinois Vehicle Code or a similar provision 14            of a local ordinance, that occurred prior to the 15            petitioner offender reaching the age of 25 years 16            and the petitioner offender has no other 17            conviction for violating Section 11-501 or 11-503 18            of the Illinois Vehicle Code or a similar 19            provision of a local ordinance shall not be 20            eligible for expungement until the petitioner has 21            reached the age of 25 years. 22                (ii) Those arrests or charges that resulted in 23            orders of supervision for any other offenses shall 24            not be eligible for expungement until 2 years have 25            passed following the satisfactory termination of 26            the supervision.  HB1836 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1            (C) When the arrest or charge not initiated by 2        arrest sought to be expunged resulted in an order of 3        qualified probation, successfully completed by the 4        petitioner, such records shall not be eligible for 5        expungement until 5 years have passed following the 6        satisfactory termination of the probation.7        (3) Those records maintained by the Illinois State 8    Police for persons arrested prior to their 17th birthday 9    shall be expunged as provided in Section 5-915 of the 10    Juvenile Court Act of 1987.11        (4) Whenever a person has been arrested for or 12    convicted of any offense, in the name of a person whose 13    identity he or she has stolen or otherwise come into 14    possession of, the aggrieved person from whom the identity 15    was stolen or otherwise obtained without authorization, 16    upon learning of the person having been arrested using his 17    or her identity, may, upon verified petition to the chief 18    judge of the circuit wherein the arrest was made, have a 19    court order entered nunc pro tunc by the Chief Judge to 20    correct the arrest record, conviction record, if any, and 21    all official records of the arresting authority, the 22    Illinois State Police, other criminal justice agencies, 23    the prosecutor, and the trial court concerning such 24    arrest, if any, by removing his or her name from all such 25    records in connection with the arrest and conviction, if 26    any, and by inserting in the records the name of the   HB1836 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    petitioner offender, if known or ascertainable, in lieu of 2    the aggrieved's name. The records of the circuit court 3    clerk shall be sealed until further order of the court 4    upon good cause shown and the name of the aggrieved person 5    obliterated on the official index required to be kept by 6    the circuit court clerk under Section 16 of the Clerks of 7    Courts Act, but the order shall not affect any index 8    issued by the circuit court clerk before the entry of the 9    order. Nothing in this Section shall limit the Illinois 10    State Police or other criminal justice agencies or 11    prosecutors from listing under a petitioner's an 12    offender's name the false names he or she has used.13        (5) Whenever a person has been convicted of criminal 14    sexual assault, aggravated criminal sexual assault, 15    predatory criminal sexual assault of a child, criminal 16    sexual abuse, or aggravated criminal sexual abuse, the 17    victim of that offense may request that the State's 18    Attorney of the county in which the conviction occurred 19    file a verified petition with the presiding trial judge at 20    the petitioner's trial to have a court order entered to 21    seal the records of the circuit court clerk in connection 22    with the proceedings of the trial court concerning that 23    offense. However, the records of the arresting authority 24    and the Illinois State Police concerning the offense shall 25    not be sealed. The court, upon good cause shown, shall 26    make the records of the circuit court clerk in connection   HB1836 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    with the proceedings of the trial court concerning the 2    offense available for public inspection.3        (6) If a conviction has been set aside on direct 4    review or on collateral attack and the court determines by 5    clear and convincing evidence that the petitioner was 6    factually innocent of the charge, the court that finds the 7    petitioner factually innocent of the charge shall enter an 8    expungement order for the conviction for which the 9    petitioner has been determined to be innocent as provided 10    in subsection (b) of Section 5-5-4 of the Unified Code of 11    Corrections.12        (7) Nothing in this Section shall prevent the Illinois 13    State Police from maintaining all records of any person 14    who is admitted to probation upon terms and conditions and 15    who fulfills those terms and conditions pursuant to 16    Section 10 of the Cannabis Control Act, Section 410 of the 17    Illinois Controlled Substances Act, Section 70 of the 18    Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, 19    Section 5-6-3.3 or 5-6-3.4 of the Unified Code of 20    Corrections, Section 12-4.3 or subdivision (b)(1) of 21    Section 12-3.05 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 22    Criminal Code of 2012, Section 10-102 of the Illinois 23    Alcoholism and Other Drug Dependency Act, Section 40-10 of 24    the Substance Use Disorder Act, or Section 10 of the 25    Steroid Control Act.26        (8) If the petitioner has been granted a certificate   HB1836 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    of innocence under Section 2-702 of the Code of Civil 2    Procedure, the court that grants the certificate of 3    innocence shall also enter an order expunging the 4    conviction for which the petitioner has been determined to 5    be innocent as provided in subsection (h) of Section 2-702 6    of the Code of Civil Procedure.7    (c) Sealing.8        (1) Applicability. Notwithstanding any other provision 9    of this Act to the contrary, and cumulative with any 10    rights to expungement of criminal records, this subsection 11    authorizes the sealing of criminal records of adults and 12    of minors prosecuted as adults. Subsection (g) of this 13    Section provides for immediate sealing of certain records. 14        (2) Eligible Records. The following records may be 15    sealed:16            (A) All arrests resulting in release without 17        charging;18            (B) Arrests or charges not initiated by arrest 19        resulting in acquittal, dismissal, or conviction when 20        the conviction was reversed or vacated, except as 21        excluded by subsection (a)(3)(B);22            (C) Arrests or charges not initiated by arrest 23        resulting in orders of supervision, including orders 24        of supervision for municipal ordinance violations, 25        successfully completed by the petitioner, unless 26        excluded by subsection (a)(3);  HB1836 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1            (C-5) Arrests or charges not initiated by arrest 2        resulting in orders of qualified probation; 3            (D) Arrests or charges not initiated by arrest 4        resulting in convictions with sentences of conditional 5        discharge or probation, completed without revocation 6        by the petitioner, including convictions on municipal 7        ordinance violations, unless otherwise excluded by 8        subsection (a)(3);9            (E) Arrests or charges not initiated by arrest 10        resulting in misdemeanor convictions not included in 11        subsection (c)(2)(D), including convictions on 12        municipal ordinance violations, unless excluded by 13        subsection (a)(3) orders of first offender probation 14        under Section 10 of the Cannabis Control Act, Section 15        410 of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, Section 16        70 of the Methamphetamine Control and Community 17        Protection Act, or Section 5-6-3.3 of the Unified Code 18        of Corrections; and19            (F) Arrests or charges not initiated by arrest 20        resulting in felony convictions not included in 21        subsection (c)(2)(D) unless otherwise excluded by 22        subsection (a)(3) (a) paragraph (3) of this Section.23        (3) When Records Are Eligible to Be Sealed. Records 24    identified as eligible under subsection (c)(2) may be 25    sealed as follows:26            (A) Records identified as eligible under   HB1836 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        subsections (c)(2)(A) and (c)(2)(B) may be sealed at 2        any time.3            (B) Records Except as otherwise provided in 4        subparagraph (E) of this paragraph (3), records 5        identified as eligible under subsection (c)(2)(C), 6        (c)(2)(C-5), (c)(2)(D), or (c)(2)(E) may be sealed 2 7        years after the termination of petitioner's last 8        sentence (as defined in subsection (a)(1)(F)).9            (C) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraphs 10        (B) and subparagraph (E) of this paragraph (3), 11        records identified as eligible under subsection 12        subsections (c)(2)(D), (c)(2)(E), and (c)(2)(F) may be 13        sealed 3 years after the termination of the 14        petitioner's last sentence (as defined in subsection 15        (a)(1)(F)). Convictions requiring public registration 16        under the Arsonist Registry Act, the Sex Offender 17        Registration Act, or the Murderer and Violent Offender 18        Against Youth Registration Act may not be sealed until 19        the petitioner is no longer required to register under 20        that relevant Act.21            (D) Records identified in subsection 22        (a)(3)(A)(iii) may be sealed after the petitioner has 23        reached the age of 25 years. 24            (E) Records identified as eligible under 25        subsection (c)(2)(C), (c)(2)(D), (c)(2)(E), or 26        (c)(2)(F) may be sealed upon termination of the   HB1836 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        petitioner's last sentence if the petitioner earned a 2        high school diploma, associate's degree, career 3        certificate, vocational technical certification, or 4        bachelor's degree, or passed the high school level 5        Test of General Educational Development, during the 6        period of his or her sentence or mandatory supervised 7        release. This subparagraph shall apply only to a 8        petitioner who has not completed the same educational 9        goal prior to the period of his or her sentence or 10        mandatory supervised release. If a petition for 11        sealing eligible records filed under this subparagraph 12        is denied by the court, the time periods under 13        subparagraph (B) or (C) shall apply to any subsequent 14        petition for sealing filed by the petitioner.15        (4) (Blank). Subsequent felony convictions. A person 16    may not have subsequent felony conviction records sealed 17    as provided in this subsection (c) if he or she is 18    convicted of any felony offense after the date of the 19    sealing of prior felony convictions as provided in this 20    subsection (c). The court may, upon conviction for a 21    subsequent felony offense, order the unsealing of prior 22    felony conviction records previously ordered sealed by the 23    court.24        (5) Notice of eligibility for sealing. Upon entry of a 25    disposition for an eligible record under this subsection 26    (c), the petitioner shall be informed by the court of the   HB1836 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    right to have the records sealed and the procedures for 2    the sealing of the records.3    (d) Procedure. The following procedures apply to 4expungement under subsections (b), (e), and (e-6) and sealing 5under subsections (c) and (e-5):6        (1) Filing the petition. Upon becoming eligible to 7    petition for the expungement or sealing of records under 8    this Section, the petitioner shall file a petition 9    requesting the expungement or sealing of records with the 10    clerk of the court where the arrests occurred or the 11    charges were brought, or both. If arrests occurred or 12    charges were brought in multiple jurisdictions, a petition 13    must be filed in each such jurisdiction. The petitioner 14    shall pay the applicable fee, except no fee shall be 15    required if the petitioner has obtained a court order 16    waiving fees under Supreme Court Rule 298 or it is 17    otherwise waived.18        (1.5) County fee waiver pilot program. From August 9, 19    2019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-306) through 20    December 31, 2020, in a county of 3,000,000 or more 21    inhabitants, no fee shall be required to be paid by a 22    petitioner if the records sought to be expunged or sealed 23    were arrests resulting in release without charging or 24    arrests or charges not initiated by arrest resulting in 25    acquittal, dismissal, or conviction when the conviction 26    was reversed or vacated, unless excluded by subsection   HB1836 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    (a)(3)(B). The provisions of this paragraph (1.5), other 2    than this sentence, are inoperative on and after January 3    1, 2022. 4        (2) Contents of petition. The petition shall be 5    verified and shall contain the petitioner's name, date of 6    birth, current address and, for each arrest or charge not 7    initiated by arrest sought to be sealed or expunged, the 8    case number, the date of arrest (if any), the identity of 9    the arresting authority, and such other information as the 10    court may require. During the pendency of the proceeding, 11    the petitioner shall promptly notify the circuit court 12    clerk of any change of his or her address. If the 13    petitioner has received a certificate of eligibility for 14    sealing from the Prisoner Review Board under paragraph 15    (10) of subsection (a) of Section 3-3-2 of the Unified 16    Code of Corrections, the certificate shall be attached to 17    the petition.18        (3) (Blank). Drug test. The petitioner must attach to 19    the petition proof that the petitioner has taken within 30 20    days before the filing of the petition a test showing the 21    absence within his or her body of all illegal substances 22    as defined by the Illinois Controlled Substances Act and 23    the Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act 24    if he or she is petitioning to:25            (A) seal felony records under clause (c)(2)(E);26            (B) seal felony records for a violation of the   HB1836 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        Illinois Controlled Substances Act, the 2        Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, 3        or the Cannabis Control Act under clause (c)(2)(F);4            (C) seal felony records under subsection (e-5); or 5            (D) expunge felony records of a qualified 6        probation under clause (b)(1)(iv).7        (4) Service of petition. The circuit court clerk shall 8    promptly serve a copy of the petition and documentation to 9    support the petition under subsection (e-5) or (e-6) on 10    the State's Attorney or prosecutor charged with the duty 11    of prosecuting the offense, the Illinois State Police, the 12    arresting agency, and, for municipal ordinance violations, 13    the chief legal officer of the unit of local government 14    effecting the arrest.15        (5) Objections.16            (A) Any party entitled to notice of the petition 17        may file an objection to the petition. All objections 18        shall be in writing, shall be filed with the circuit 19        court clerk, and shall state with specificity the 20        basis of the objection. Whenever a person who has been 21        convicted of an offense is granted a pardon by the 22        Governor which specifically authorizes expungement, an 23        objection to the petition may not be filed.24            (B) Objections to a petition to expunge or seal 25        must be filed within 60 days of the date of service of 26        the petition.  HB1836 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        (6) Entry of order.2            (A) The Chief Judge of the circuit wherein the 3        charge was brought, any judge of that circuit 4        designated by the Chief Judge, or in counties of less 5        than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the presiding trial judge 6        at the petitioner's trial, if any, shall rule on the 7        petition to expunge or seal as set forth in this 8        subsection (d)(6).9            (B) Unless the State's Attorney or prosecutor, the 10        Illinois State Police, the arresting agency, or the 11        chief legal officer files an objection to the petition 12        to expunge or seal within 60 days from the date of 13        service of the petition, the court shall enter an 14        order granting or denying the petition.15            (C) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 16        the court shall not deny a petition for sealing under 17        this Section because the petitioner has not satisfied 18        an outstanding legal financial obligation established, 19        imposed, or originated by a court, law enforcement 20        agency, or a municipal, State, county, or other unit 21        of local government, including, but not limited to, 22        any cost, assessment, fine, or fee. An outstanding 23        legal financial obligation does not include any court 24        ordered restitution to a victim under Section 5-5-6 of 25        the Unified Code of Corrections, unless the 26        restitution has been converted to a civil judgment.   HB1836 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        Nothing in this subparagraph (C) waives, rescinds, or 2        abrogates a legal financial obligation or otherwise 3        eliminates or affects the right of the holder of any 4        financial obligation to pursue collection under 5        applicable federal, State, or local law. 6            (D) (Blank). Notwithstanding any other provision 7        of law, the court shall not deny a petition to expunge 8        or seal under this Section because the petitioner has 9        submitted a drug test taken within 30 days before the 10        filing of the petition to expunge or seal that 11        indicates a positive test for the presence of cannabis 12        within the petitioner's body. In this subparagraph 13        (D), "cannabis" has the meaning ascribed to it in 14        Section 3 of the Cannabis Control Act. 15        (7) Hearings. If an objection is filed, the court 16    shall set a date for a hearing and notify the petitioner 17    and all parties entitled to notice of the petition of the 18    hearing date at least 30 days prior to the hearing. Prior 19    to the hearing, the State's Attorney shall consult with 20    the Illinois State Police as to the appropriateness of the 21    relief sought in the petition to expunge or seal. At the 22    hearing, the court shall hear evidence on whether the 23    petition should or should not be granted, and shall grant 24    or deny the petition to expunge or seal the records based 25    on the evidence presented at the hearing. The court may 26    consider the following:  HB1836 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1            (A) the strength of the evidence supporting the 2        defendant's conviction; 3            (B) the reasons for retention of the conviction 4        records by the State; 5            (C) the petitioner's age, criminal record history, 6        and employment history; 7            (D) the period of time between the petitioner's 8        arrest on the charge resulting in the conviction and 9        the filing of the petition under this Section; and 10            (E) the specific adverse consequences the 11        petitioner may be subject to if the petition is 12        denied. 13        (8) Service of order. After entering an order to 14    expunge or seal records, the court must provide copies of 15    the order to the Illinois State Police, in a form and 16    manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police, to the 17    petitioner, to the State's Attorney or prosecutor charged 18    with the duty of prosecuting the offense, to the arresting 19    agency, to the chief legal officer of the unit of local 20    government effecting the arrest for municipal ordinance 21    violations, and to such other criminal justice agencies as 22    may be ordered by the court. The disposition information 23    for each case or record ordered expunged, sealed, or 24    impounded shall be attached to the order provided to the 25    Illinois State Police. 26        (9) Implementation of order.  HB1836 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1            (A) Upon entry of an order to expunge records 2        pursuant to subsection (b)(2)(A) or (b)(2)(B)(ii), or 3        both:4                (i) the records shall be expunged (as defined 5            in subsection (a)(1)(E)) by the arresting agency, 6            the Illinois State Police, and any other agency as 7            ordered by the court, within 60 days of the date of 8            service of the order, unless a motion to vacate, 9            modify, or reconsider the order is filed pursuant 10            to paragraph (12) of subsection (d) of this 11            Section;12                (ii) the records of the circuit court clerk 13            shall be impounded until further order of the 14            court upon good cause shown and the name of the 15            petitioner obliterated on the official index 16            required to be kept by the circuit court clerk 17            under Section 16 of the Clerks of Courts Act, but 18            the order shall not affect any index issued by the 19            circuit court clerk before the entry of the order; 20            and21                (iii) in response to an inquiry for expunged 22            records, the court, the Illinois State Police, or 23            the agency receiving such inquiry, shall reply as 24            it does in response to inquiries when no records 25            ever existed.26            (B) Upon entry of an order to expunge records   HB1836 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        pursuant to subsection (b)(2)(B)(i) or (b)(2)(C), or 2        both:3                (i) the records shall be expunged (as defined 4            in subsection (a)(1)(E)) by the arresting agency 5            and any other agency as ordered by the court, 6            within 60 days of the date of service of the order, 7            unless a motion to vacate, modify, or reconsider 8            the order is filed pursuant to paragraph (12) of 9            subsection (d) of this Section;10                (ii) the records of the circuit court clerk 11            shall be impounded until further order of the 12            court upon good cause shown and the name of the 13            petitioner obliterated on the official index 14            required to be kept by the circuit court clerk 15            under Section 16 of the Clerks of Courts Act, but 16            the order shall not affect any index issued by the 17            circuit court clerk before the entry of the order;18                (iii) the records shall be impounded by the 19            Illinois State Police within 60 days of the date 20            of service of the order as ordered by the court, 21            unless a motion to vacate, modify, or reconsider 22            the order is filed pursuant to paragraph (12) of 23            subsection (d) of this Section;24                (iv) records impounded by the Illinois State 25            Police may be disseminated by the Illinois State 26            Police only as required by law or to the arresting   HB1836 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1            authority, the State's Attorney, and the court 2            upon a later arrest for the same or a similar 3            offense or for the purpose of sentencing for any 4            subsequent felony, and to the Department of 5            Corrections upon conviction for any offense; and6                (v) in response to an inquiry for such records 7            from anyone not authorized by law to access such 8            records, the court, the Illinois State Police, or 9            the agency receiving such inquiry shall reply as 10            it does in response to inquiries when no records 11            ever existed.12            (B-5) Upon entry of an order to expunge records 13        under subsection (e-6):14                (i) the records shall be expunged (as defined 15            in subsection (a)(1)(E)) by the arresting agency 16            and any other agency as ordered by the court, 17            within 60 days of the date of service of the order, 18            unless a motion to vacate, modify, or reconsider 19            the order is filed under paragraph (12) of 20            subsection (d) of this Section;21                (ii) the records of the circuit court clerk 22            shall be impounded until further order of the 23            court upon good cause shown and the name of the 24            petitioner obliterated on the official index 25            required to be kept by the circuit court clerk 26            under Section 16 of the Clerks of Courts Act, but   HB1836 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1            the order shall not affect any index issued by the 2            circuit court clerk before the entry of the order;3                (iii) the records shall be impounded by the 4            Illinois State Police within 60 days of the date 5            of service of the order as ordered by the court, 6            unless a motion to vacate, modify, or reconsider 7            the order is filed under paragraph (12) of 8            subsection (d) of this Section;9                (iv) records impounded by the Illinois State 10            Police may be disseminated by the Illinois State 11            Police only as required by law or to the arresting 12            authority, the State's Attorney, and the court 13            upon a later arrest for the same or a similar 14            offense or for the purpose of sentencing for any 15            subsequent felony, and to the Department of 16            Corrections upon conviction for any offense; and17                (v) in response to an inquiry for these 18            records from anyone not authorized by law to 19            access the records, the court, the Illinois State 20            Police, or the agency receiving the inquiry shall 21            reply as it does in response to inquiries when no 22            records ever existed. 23            (C) Upon entry of an order to seal records under 24        subsection (c), the arresting agency, any other agency 25        as ordered by the court, the Illinois State Police, 26        and the court shall seal the records (as defined in   HB1836 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        subsection (a)(1)(K)). In response to an inquiry for 2        such records, from anyone not authorized by law to 3        access such records, the court, the Illinois State 4        Police, or the agency receiving such inquiry shall 5        reply as it does in response to inquiries when no 6        records ever existed.7            (D) The Illinois State Police shall send written 8        notice to the petitioner of its compliance with each 9        order to expunge or seal records within 60 days of the 10        date of service of that order or, if a motion to 11        vacate, modify, or reconsider is filed, within 60 days 12        of service of the order resolving the motion, if that 13        order requires the Illinois State Police to expunge or 14        seal records. In the event of an appeal from the 15        circuit court order, the Illinois State Police shall 16        send written notice to the petitioner of its 17        compliance with an Appellate Court or Supreme Court 18        judgment to expunge or seal records within 60 days of 19        the issuance of the court's mandate. The notice is not 20        required while any motion to vacate, modify, or 21        reconsider, or any appeal or petition for 22        discretionary appellate review, is pending. 23            (E) Upon motion, the court may order that a sealed 24        judgment or other court record necessary to 25        demonstrate the amount of any legal financial 26        obligation due and owing be made available for the   HB1836 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        limited purpose of collecting any legal financial 2        obligations owed by the petitioner that were 3        established, imposed, or originated in the criminal 4        proceeding for which those records have been sealed. 5        The records made available under this subparagraph (E) 6        shall not be entered into the official index required 7        to be kept by the circuit court clerk under Section 16 8        of the Clerks of Courts Act and shall be immediately 9        re-impounded upon the collection of the outstanding 10        financial obligations. 11            (F) Notwithstanding any other provision of this 12        Section, a circuit court clerk may access a sealed 13        record for the limited purpose of collecting payment 14        for any legal financial obligations that were 15        established, imposed, or originated in the criminal 16        proceedings for which those records have been sealed. 17        (10) Fees. The Illinois State Police may charge the 18    petitioner a fee equivalent to the cost of processing any 19    order to expunge or seal records. Notwithstanding any 20    provision of the Clerks of Courts Act to the contrary, the 21    circuit court clerk may charge a fee equivalent to the 22    cost associated with the sealing or expungement of records 23    by the circuit court clerk. From the total filing fee 24    collected for the petition to seal or expunge, the circuit 25    court clerk shall deposit $10 into the Circuit Court Clerk 26    Operation and Administrative Fund, to be used to offset   HB1836 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    the costs incurred by the circuit court clerk in 2    performing the additional duties required to serve the 3    petition to seal or expunge on all parties. The circuit 4    court clerk shall collect and remit the Illinois State 5    Police portion of the fee to the State Treasurer and it 6    shall be deposited in the State Police Services Fund. If 7    the record brought under an expungement petition was 8    previously sealed under this Section, the fee for the 9    expungement petition for that same record shall be waived. 10        (11) Final Order. No court order issued under the 11    expungement or sealing provisions of this Section shall 12    become final for purposes of appeal until 30 days after 13    service of the order on the petitioner and all parties 14    entitled to notice of the petition.15        (12) Motion to Vacate, Modify, or Reconsider. Under 16    Section 2-1203 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the 17    petitioner or any party entitled to notice may file a 18    motion to vacate, modify, or reconsider the order granting 19    or denying the petition to expunge or seal within 60 days 20    of service of the order. If filed more than 60 days after 21    service of the order, a petition to vacate, modify, or 22    reconsider shall comply with subsection (c) of Section 23    2-1401 of the Code of Civil Procedure. Upon filing of a 24    motion to vacate, modify, or reconsider, notice of the 25    motion shall be served upon the petitioner and all parties 26    entitled to notice of the petition.   HB1836 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        (13) Effect of Order. An order granting a petition 2    under the expungement or sealing provisions of this 3    Section shall not be considered void because it fails to 4    comply with the provisions of this Section or because of 5    any error asserted in a motion to vacate, modify, or 6    reconsider. The circuit court retains jurisdiction to 7    determine whether the order is voidable and to vacate, 8    modify, or reconsider its terms based on a motion filed 9    under paragraph (12) of this subsection (d).10        (14) Compliance with Order Granting Petition to Seal 11    Records. Unless a court has entered a stay of an order 12    granting a petition to seal, all parties entitled to 13    notice of the petition must fully comply with the terms of 14    the order within 60 days of service of the order even if a 15    party is seeking relief from the order through a motion 16    filed under paragraph (12) of this subsection (d) or is 17    appealing the order.18        (15) Compliance with Order Granting Petition to 19    Expunge Records. While a party is seeking relief from the 20    order granting the petition to expunge through a motion 21    filed under paragraph (12) of this subsection (d) or is 22    appealing the order, and unless a court has entered a stay 23    of that order, the parties entitled to notice of the 24    petition must seal, but need not expunge, the records 25    until there is a final order on the motion for relief or, 26    in the case of an appeal, the issuance of that court's   HB1836 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    mandate.2        (16) The changes to this subsection (d) made by Public 3    Act 98-163 apply to all petitions pending on August 5, 4    2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-163) and to all 5    orders ruling on a petition to expunge or seal on or after 6    August 5, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-163). 7        (17) Upon request, and without court order, the 8    circuit court clerk shall provide the disposition 9    information for any record that was ordered to be sealed 10    or impounded pursuant to this Section to the Illinois 11    State Police. 12    (e) Whenever a person who has been convicted of an offense 13is granted a pardon by the Governor which specifically 14authorizes expungement, he or she may, upon verified petition 15to the Chief Judge of the circuit where the person had been 16convicted, any judge of the circuit designated by the Chief 17Judge, or in counties of less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the 18presiding trial judge at the defendant's trial, have a court 19order entered expunging the record of arrest from the official 20records of the arresting authority and order that the records 21of the circuit court clerk and the Illinois State Police be 22sealed until further order of the court upon good cause shown 23or as otherwise provided herein, and the name of the defendant 24obliterated from the official index requested to be kept by 25the circuit court clerk under Section 16 of the Clerks of 26Courts Act in connection with the arrest and conviction for   HB1836 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1the offense for which he or she had been pardoned but the order 2shall not affect any index issued by the circuit court clerk 3before the entry of the order. All records sealed by the 4Illinois State Police may be disseminated by the Illinois 5State Police only to the arresting authority, the State's 6Attorney, and the court upon a later arrest for the same or 7similar offense or for the purpose of sentencing for any 8subsequent felony. Upon conviction for any subsequent offense, 9the Department of Corrections shall have access to all sealed 10records of the Illinois State Police pertaining to that 11individual. Upon entry of the order of expungement, the 12circuit court clerk shall promptly mail a copy of the order to 13the person who was pardoned.14    (e-5) Whenever a person who has been convicted of an 15offense is granted a certificate of eligibility for sealing by 16the Prisoner Review Board which specifically authorizes 17sealing, he or she may, upon verified petition to the Chief 18Judge of the circuit where the person had been convicted, any 19judge of the circuit designated by the Chief Judge, or in 20counties of less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the presiding 21trial judge at the petitioner's trial, have a court order 22entered sealing the record of arrest from the official records 23of the arresting authority and order that the records of the 24circuit court clerk and the Illinois State Police be sealed 25until further order of the court upon good cause shown or as 26otherwise provided herein, and the name of the petitioner   HB1836 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1obliterated from the official index requested to be kept by 2the circuit court clerk under Section 16 of the Clerks of 3Courts Act in connection with the arrest and conviction for 4the offense for which he or she had been granted the 5certificate but the order shall not affect any index issued by 6the circuit court clerk before the entry of the order. All 7records sealed by the Illinois State Police may be 8disseminated by the Illinois State Police only as required by 9this Act or to the arresting authority, a law enforcement 10agency, the State's Attorney, and the court upon a later 11arrest for the same or similar offense or for the purpose of 12sentencing for any subsequent felony. Upon conviction for any 13subsequent offense, the Department of Corrections shall have 14access to all sealed records of the Illinois State Police 15pertaining to that individual. Upon entry of the order of 16sealing, the circuit court clerk shall promptly mail a copy of 17the order to the person who was granted the certificate of 18eligibility for sealing. 19    (e-6) Whenever a person who has been convicted of an 20offense is granted a certificate of eligibility for 21expungement by the Prisoner Review Board which specifically 22authorizes expungement, he or she may, upon verified petition 23to the Chief Judge of the circuit where the person had been 24convicted, any judge of the circuit designated by the Chief 25Judge, or in counties of less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the 26presiding trial judge at the petitioner's trial, have a court   HB1836 Enrolled- 48 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1order entered expunging the record of arrest from the official 2records of the arresting authority and order that the records 3of the circuit court clerk and the Illinois State Police be 4sealed until further order of the court upon good cause shown 5or as otherwise provided herein, and the name of the 6petitioner obliterated from the official index requested to be 7kept by the circuit court clerk under Section 16 of the Clerks 8of Courts Act in connection with the arrest and conviction for 9the offense for which he or she had been granted the 10certificate but the order shall not affect any index issued by 11the circuit court clerk before the entry of the order. All 12records sealed by the Illinois State Police may be 13disseminated by the Illinois State Police only as required by 14this Act or to the arresting authority, a law enforcement 15agency, the State's Attorney, and the court upon a later 16arrest for the same or similar offense or for the purpose of 17sentencing for any subsequent felony. Upon conviction for any 18subsequent offense, the Department of Corrections shall have 19access to all expunged records of the Illinois State Police 20pertaining to that individual. Upon entry of the order of 21expungement, the circuit court clerk shall promptly mail a 22copy of the order to the person who was granted the certificate 23of eligibility for expungement. 24    (f) Subject to available funding, the Illinois Department 25of Corrections shall conduct a study of the impact of sealing, 26especially on employment and recidivism rates, utilizing a   HB1836 Enrolled- 49 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1random sample of those who apply for the sealing of their 2criminal records under Public Act 93-211. At the request of 3the Illinois Department of Corrections, records of the 4Illinois Department of Employment Security shall be utilized 5as appropriate to assist in the study. The study shall not 6disclose any data in a manner that would allow the 7identification of any particular individual or employing unit. 8The study shall be made available to the General Assembly no 9later than September 1, 2010.10    (g) Immediate Sealing.11        (1) Applicability. Notwithstanding any other provision 12    of this Act to the contrary, and cumulative with any 13    rights to expungement or sealing of criminal records, this 14    subsection authorizes the immediate sealing of criminal 15    records of adults and of minors prosecuted as adults.16        (2) Eligible Records. Arrests or charges not initiated 17    by arrest resulting in acquittal or dismissal with 18    prejudice, except as excluded by subsection (a)(3)(B), 19    that occur on or after January 1, 2018 (the effective date 20    of Public Act 100-282), may be sealed immediately if the 21    petition is filed with the circuit court clerk on the same 22    day and during the same hearing in which the case is 23    disposed.24        (3) When Records are Eligible to be Immediately 25    Sealed. Eligible records under paragraph (2) of this 26    subsection (g) may be sealed immediately after entry of   HB1836 Enrolled- 50 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    the final disposition of a case, notwithstanding the 2    disposition of other charges in the same case.3        (4) Notice of Eligibility for Immediate Sealing. Upon 4    entry of a disposition for an eligible record under this 5    subsection (g), the defendant shall be informed by the 6    court of his or her right to have eligible records 7    immediately sealed and the procedure for the immediate 8    sealing of these records.9        (5) Procedure. The following procedures apply to 10    immediate sealing under this subsection (g).11            (A) Filing the Petition. Upon entry of the final 12        disposition of the case, the defendant's attorney may 13        immediately petition the court, on behalf of the 14        defendant, for immediate sealing of eligible records 15        under paragraph (2) of this subsection (g) that are 16        entered on or after January 1, 2018 (the effective 17        date of Public Act 100-282). The immediate sealing 18        petition may be filed with the circuit court clerk 19        during the hearing in which the final disposition of 20        the case is entered. If the defendant's attorney does 21        not file the petition for immediate sealing during the 22        hearing, the defendant may file a petition for sealing 23        at any time as authorized under subsection (c)(3)(A).24            (B) Contents of Petition. The immediate sealing 25        petition shall be verified and shall contain the 26        petitioner's name, date of birth, current address, and   HB1836 Enrolled- 51 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        for each eligible record, the case number, the date of 2        arrest if applicable, the identity of the arresting 3        authority if applicable, and other information as the 4        court may require.5            (C) Drug Test. The petitioner shall not be 6        required to attach proof that he or she has passed a 7        drug test.8            (D) Service of Petition. A copy of the petition 9        shall be served on the State's Attorney in open court. 10        The petitioner shall not be required to serve a copy of 11        the petition on any other agency.12            (E) Entry of Order. The presiding trial judge 13        shall enter an order granting or denying the petition 14        for immediate sealing during the hearing in which it 15        is filed. Petitions for immediate sealing shall be 16        ruled on in the same hearing in which the final 17        disposition of the case is entered.18            (F) Hearings. The court shall hear the petition 19        for immediate sealing on the same day and during the 20        same hearing in which the disposition is rendered.21            (G) Service of Order. An order to immediately seal 22        eligible records shall be served in conformance with 23        subsection (d)(8).24            (H) Implementation of Order. An order to 25        immediately seal records shall be implemented in 26        conformance with subsections (d)(9)(C) and (d)(9)(D).  HB1836 Enrolled- 52 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1            (I) Fees. The fee imposed by the circuit court 2        clerk and the Illinois State Police shall comply with 3        paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of this Section.4            (J) Final Order. No court order issued under this 5        subsection (g) shall become final for purposes of 6        appeal until 30 days after service of the order on the 7        petitioner and all parties entitled to service of the 8        order in conformance with subsection (d)(8).9            (K) Motion to Vacate, Modify, or Reconsider. Under 10        Section 2-1203 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the 11        petitioner, State's Attorney, or the Illinois State 12        Police may file a motion to vacate, modify, or 13        reconsider the order denying the petition to 14        immediately seal within 60 days of service of the 15        order. If filed more than 60 days after service of the 16        order, a petition to vacate, modify, or reconsider 17        shall comply with subsection (c) of Section 2-1401 of 18        the Code of Civil Procedure.19            (L) Effect of Order. An order granting an 20        immediate sealing petition shall not be considered 21        void because it fails to comply with the provisions of 22        this Section or because of an error asserted in a 23        motion to vacate, modify, or reconsider. The circuit 24        court retains jurisdiction to determine whether the 25        order is voidable, and to vacate, modify, or 26        reconsider its terms based on a motion filed under   HB1836 Enrolled- 53 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        subparagraph (L) of this subsection (g).2            (M) Compliance with Order Granting Petition to 3        Seal Records. Unless a court has entered a stay of an 4        order granting a petition to immediately seal, all 5        parties entitled to service of the order must fully 6        comply with the terms of the order within 60 days of 7        service of the order. 8    (h) Sealing or vacation and expungement of trafficking 9victims' crimes.10        (1) A trafficking victim, as defined by paragraph (10) 11    of subsection (a) of Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 12    2012, may petition for vacation and expungement or 13    immediate sealing of his or her criminal record upon the 14    completion of his or her last sentence if his or her 15    participation in the underlying offense was a result of 16    human trafficking under Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code 17    of 2012 or a severe form of trafficking under the federal 18    Trafficking Victims Protection Act. 19        (1.5) A petition under paragraph (1) shall be 20    prepared, signed, and filed in accordance with Supreme 21    Court Rule 9. The court may allow the petitioner to attend 22    any required hearing remotely in accordance with local 23    rules. The court may allow a petition to be filed under 24    seal if the public filing of the petition would constitute 25    a risk of harm to the petitioner.26        (2) A petitioner under this subsection (h), in   HB1836 Enrolled- 54 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    addition to the requirements provided under paragraph (4) 2    of subsection (d) of this Section, shall include in his or 3    her petition a clear and concise statement that: (A) he or 4    she was a victim of human trafficking at the time of the 5    offense; and (B) that his or her participation in the 6    offense was a result of human trafficking under Section 7    10-9 of the Criminal Code of 2012 or a severe form of 8    trafficking under the federal Trafficking Victims 9    Protection Act. 10        (3) If an objection is filed alleging that the 11    petitioner is not entitled to vacation and expungement or 12    immediate sealing under this subsection (h), the court 13    shall conduct a hearing under paragraph (7) of subsection 14    (d) of this Section and the court shall determine whether 15    the petitioner is entitled to vacation and expungement or 16    immediate sealing under this subsection (h). A petitioner 17    is eligible for vacation and expungement or immediate 18    relief under this subsection (h) if he or she shows, by a 19    preponderance of the evidence, that: (A) he or she was a 20    victim of human trafficking at the time of the offense; 21    and (B) that his or her participation in the offense was a 22    result of human trafficking under Section 10-9 of the 23    Criminal Code of 2012 or a severe form of trafficking 24    under the federal Trafficking Victims Protection Act.25    (i) Minor Cannabis Offenses under the Cannabis Control 26Act.  HB1836 Enrolled- 55 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        (1) Expungement of Arrest Records of Minor Cannabis 2    Offenses.3            (A) The Illinois State Police and all law 4        enforcement agencies within the State shall 5        automatically expunge all criminal history records of 6        an arrest, charge not initiated by arrest, order of 7        supervision, or order of qualified probation for a 8        Minor Cannabis Offense committed prior to June 25, 9        2019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-27) if:10                (i) One year or more has elapsed since the 11            date of the arrest or law enforcement interaction 12            documented in the records; and13                (ii) No criminal charges were filed relating 14            to the arrest or law enforcement interaction or 15            criminal charges were filed and subsequently 16            dismissed or vacated or the arrestee was 17            acquitted.18            (B) If the law enforcement agency is unable to 19        verify satisfaction of condition (ii) in paragraph 20        (A), records that satisfy condition (i) in paragraph 21        (A) shall be automatically expunged.22            (C) Records shall be expunged by the law 23        enforcement agency under the following timelines:24                (i) Records created prior to June 25, 2019 25            (the effective date of Public Act 101-27), but on 26            or after January 1, 2013, shall be automatically   HB1836 Enrolled- 56 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1            expunged prior to January 1, 2021;2                (ii) Records created prior to January 1, 2013, 3            but on or after January 1, 2000, shall be 4            automatically expunged prior to January 1, 2023;5                (iii) Records created prior to January 1, 2000 6            shall be automatically expunged prior to January 7            1, 2025.8            In response to an inquiry for expunged records, 9        the law enforcement agency receiving such inquiry 10        shall reply as it does in response to inquiries when no 11        records ever existed; however, it shall provide a 12        certificate of disposition or confirmation that the 13        record was expunged to the individual whose record was 14        expunged if such a record exists. 15            (D) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 16        restrict or modify an individual's right to have that 17        individual's records expunged except as otherwise may 18        be provided in this Act, or diminish or abrogate any 19        rights or remedies otherwise available to the 20        individual.21        (2) Pardons Authorizing Expungement of Minor Cannabis 22    Offenses.23            (A) Upon June 25, 2019 (the effective date of 24        Public Act 101-27), the Department of State Police 25        shall review all criminal history record information 26        and identify all records that meet all of the   HB1836 Enrolled- 57 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        following criteria:2                (i) one or more convictions for a Minor 3            Cannabis Offense;4                (ii) the conviction identified in paragraph 5            (2)(A)(i) did not include a penalty enhancement 6            under Section 7 of the Cannabis Control Act; and7                (iii) the conviction identified in paragraph 8            (2)(A)(i) is not associated with a conviction for 9            a violent crime as defined in subsection (c) of 10            Section 3 of the Rights of Crime Victims and 11            Witnesses Act.12            (B) Within 180 days after June 25, 2019 (the 13        effective date of Public Act 101-27), the Department 14        of State Police shall notify the Prisoner Review Board 15        of all such records that meet the criteria established 16        in paragraph (2)(A).17                (i) The Prisoner Review Board shall notify the 18            State's Attorney of the county of conviction of 19            each record identified by State Police in 20            paragraph (2)(A) that is classified as a Class 4 21            felony. The State's Attorney may provide a written 22            objection to the Prisoner Review Board on the sole 23            basis that the record identified does not meet the 24            criteria established in paragraph (2)(A). Such an 25            objection must be filed within 60 days or by such 26            later date set by the Prisoner Review Board in the   HB1836 Enrolled- 58 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1            notice after the State's Attorney received notice 2            from the Prisoner Review Board.3                (ii) In response to a written objection from a 4            State's Attorney, the Prisoner Review Board is 5            authorized to conduct a non-public hearing to 6            evaluate the information provided in the 7            objection.8                (iii) The Prisoner Review Board shall make a 9            confidential and privileged recommendation to the 10            Governor as to whether to grant a pardon 11            authorizing expungement for each of the records 12            identified by the Department of State Police as 13            described in paragraph (2)(A).14            (C) If an individual has been granted a pardon 15        authorizing expungement as described in this Section, 16        the Prisoner Review Board, through the Attorney 17        General, shall file a petition for expungement with 18        the Chief Judge of the circuit or any judge of the 19        circuit designated by the Chief Judge where the 20        individual had been convicted. Such petition may 21        include more than one individual. Whenever an 22        individual who has been convicted of an offense is 23        granted a pardon by the Governor that specifically 24        authorizes expungement, an objection to the petition 25        may not be filed. Petitions to expunge under this 26        subsection (i) may include more than one individual.   HB1836 Enrolled- 59 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        Within 90 days of the filing of such a petition, the 2        court shall enter an order expunging the records of 3        arrest from the official records of the arresting 4        authority and order that the records of the circuit 5        court clerk and the Illinois State Police be expunged 6        and the name of the defendant obliterated from the 7        official index requested to be kept by the circuit 8        court clerk under Section 16 of the Clerks of Courts 9        Act in connection with the arrest and conviction for 10        the offense for which the individual had received a 11        pardon but the order shall not affect any index issued 12        by the circuit court clerk before the entry of the 13        order. Upon entry of the order of expungement, the 14        circuit court clerk shall promptly provide a copy of 15        the order and a certificate of disposition to the 16        individual who was pardoned to the individual's last 17        known address or by electronic means (if available) or 18        otherwise make it available to the individual upon 19        request.20            (D) Nothing in this Section is intended to 21        diminish or abrogate any rights or remedies otherwise 22        available to the individual.23        (3) Any individual may file a motion to vacate and 24    expunge a conviction for a misdemeanor or Class 4 felony 25    violation of Section 4 or Section 5 of the Cannabis 26    Control Act. Motions to vacate and expunge under this   HB1836 Enrolled- 60 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    subsection (i) may be filed with the circuit court, Chief 2    Judge of a judicial circuit or any judge of the circuit 3    designated by the Chief Judge. The circuit court clerk 4    shall promptly serve a copy of the motion to vacate and 5    expunge, and any supporting documentation, on the State's 6    Attorney or prosecutor charged with the duty of 7    prosecuting the offense. When considering such a motion to 8    vacate and expunge, a court shall consider the following: 9    the reasons to retain the records provided by law 10    enforcement, the petitioner's age, the petitioner's age at 11    the time of offense, the time since the conviction, and 12    the specific adverse consequences if denied. An individual 13    may file such a petition after the completion of any 14    non-financial sentence or non-financial condition imposed 15    by the conviction. Within 60 days of the filing of such 16    motion, a State's Attorney may file an objection to such a 17    petition along with supporting evidence. If a motion to 18    vacate and expunge is granted, the records shall be 19    expunged in accordance with subparagraphs (d)(8) and 20    (d)(9)(A) of this Section. An agency providing civil legal 21    aid, as defined by Section 15 of the Public Interest 22    Attorney Assistance Act, assisting individuals seeking to 23    file a motion to vacate and expunge under this subsection 24    may file motions to vacate and expunge with the Chief 25    Judge of a judicial circuit or any judge of the circuit 26    designated by the Chief Judge, and the motion may include   HB1836 Enrolled- 61 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    more than one individual. Motions filed by an agency 2    providing civil legal aid concerning more than one 3    individual may be prepared, presented, and signed 4    electronically.5        (4) Any State's Attorney may file a motion to vacate 6    and expunge a conviction for a misdemeanor or Class 4 7    felony violation of Section 4 or Section 5 of the Cannabis 8    Control Act. Motions to vacate and expunge under this 9    subsection (i) may be filed with the circuit court, Chief 10    Judge of a judicial circuit or any judge of the circuit 11    designated by the Chief Judge, and may include more than 12    one individual. Motions filed by a State's Attorney 13    concerning more than one individual may be prepared, 14    presented, and signed electronically. When considering 15    such a motion to vacate and expunge, a court shall 16    consider the following: the reasons to retain the records 17    provided by law enforcement, the individual's age, the 18    individual's age at the time of offense, the time since 19    the conviction, and the specific adverse consequences if 20    denied. Upon entry of an order granting a motion to vacate 21    and expunge records pursuant to this Section, the State's 22    Attorney shall notify the Prisoner Review Board within 30 23    days. Upon entry of the order of expungement, the circuit 24    court clerk shall promptly provide a copy of the order and 25    a certificate of disposition to the individual whose 26    records will be expunged to the individual's last known   HB1836 Enrolled- 62 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    address or by electronic means (if available) or otherwise 2    make available to the individual upon request. If a motion 3    to vacate and expunge is granted, the records shall be 4    expunged in accordance with subparagraphs (d)(8) and 5    (d)(9)(A) of this Section.6        (5) In the public interest, the State's Attorney of a 7    county has standing to file motions to vacate and expunge 8    pursuant to this Section in the circuit court with 9    jurisdiction over the underlying conviction.10        (6) If a person is arrested for a Minor Cannabis 11    Offense as defined in this Section before June 25, 2019 12    (the effective date of Public Act 101-27) and the person's 13    case is still pending but a sentence has not been imposed, 14    the person may petition the court in which the charges are 15    pending for an order to summarily dismiss those charges 16    against him or her, and expunge all official records of 17    his or her arrest, plea, trial, conviction, incarceration, 18    supervision, or expungement. If the court determines, upon 19    review, that: (A) the person was arrested before June 25, 20    2019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-27) for an 21    offense that has been made eligible for expungement; (B) 22    the case is pending at the time; and (C) the person has not 23    been sentenced of the minor cannabis violation eligible 24    for expungement under this subsection, the court shall 25    consider the following: the reasons to retain the records 26    provided by law enforcement, the petitioner's age, the   HB1836 Enrolled- 63 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    petitioner's age at the time of offense, the time since 2    the conviction, and the specific adverse consequences if 3    denied. If a motion to dismiss and expunge is granted, the 4    records shall be expunged in accordance with subparagraph 5    (d)(9)(A) of this Section.6        (7) A person imprisoned solely as a result of one or 7    more convictions for Minor Cannabis Offenses under this 8    subsection (i) shall be released from incarceration upon 9    the issuance of an order under this subsection.10        (8) The Illinois State Police shall allow a person to 11    use the access and review process, established in the 12    Illinois State Police, for verifying that his or her 13    records relating to Minor Cannabis Offenses of the 14    Cannabis Control Act eligible under this Section have been 15    expunged.16        (9) No conviction vacated pursuant to this Section 17    shall serve as the basis for damages for time unjustly 18    served as provided in the Court of Claims Act. 19        (10) Effect of Expungement. A person's right to 20    expunge an expungeable offense shall not be limited under 21    this Section. The effect of an order of expungement shall 22    be to restore the person to the status he or she occupied 23    before the arrest, charge, or conviction.24        (11) Information. The Illinois State Police shall post 25    general information on its website about the expungement 26    process described in this subsection (i).   HB1836 Enrolled- 64 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    (j) Felony Prostitution Convictions.2        (1) Automatic Sealing of Felony Prostitution Arrests.3            (A) The Illinois State Police and local law 4        enforcement agencies within the State shall 5        automatically seal the law enforcement records 6        relating to a person's Class 4 felony arrests and 7        charges not initiated by arrest for prostitution if 8        that arrest or charge not initiated by arrest is 9        eligible for sealing under paragraph (2) of subsection 10        (c).11            (B) In the absence of a court order or upon the 12        order of a court, the clerk of the circuit court shall 13        automatically seal the court records and case files 14        relating to a person's Class 4 felony arrests and 15        charges not initiated by arrest for prostitution if 16        that arrest or charge not initiated by arrest is 17        eligible for sealing under paragraph (2) of subsection 18        (c).19            (C) The automatic sealing described in this 20        paragraph (1) shall be completed no later than January 21        1, 2028.22        (2) Automatic Sealing of Felony Prostitution 23    Convictions.24            (A) The Illinois State Police and local law 25        enforcement agencies within the State shall 26        automatically seal the law enforcement records   HB1836 Enrolled- 65 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        relating to a person's Class 4 felony conviction for 2        prostitution if those records are eligible for sealing 3        under paragraph (2) of subsection (c).4            (B) In the absence of a court order or upon the 5        order of a court, the clerk of the circuit court shall 6        automatically seal the court records relating to a 7        person's Class 4 felony conviction for prostitution if 8        those records are eligible for sealing under paragraph 9        (2) of subsection (c).10            (C) The automatic sealing of records described in 11        this paragraph (2) shall be completed no later than 12        January 1, 2028.13        (3) Motions to Vacate and Expunge Felony Prostitution 14    Convictions. Any individual may file a motion to vacate 15    and expunge a conviction for a prior Class 4 felony 16    violation of prostitution. Motions to vacate and expunge 17    under this subsection (j) may be filed with the circuit 18    court, Chief Judge of a judicial circuit, or any judge of 19    the circuit designated by the Chief Judge. When 20    considering the motion to vacate and expunge, a court 21    shall consider the following:22            (A) the reasons to retain the records provided by 23        law enforcement;24            (B) the petitioner's age;25            (C) the petitioner's age at the time of offense; 26        and  HB1836 Enrolled- 66 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1            (D) the time since the conviction, and the 2        specific adverse consequences if denied. An individual 3        may file the petition after the completion of any 4        sentence or condition imposed by the conviction. 5        Within 60 days of the filing of the motion, a State's 6        Attorney may file an objection to the petition along 7        with supporting evidence. If a motion to vacate and 8        expunge is granted, the records shall be expunged in 9        accordance with subparagraph (d)(9)(A) of this 10        Section. An agency providing civil legal aid, as 11        defined in Section 15 of the Public Interest Attorney 12        Assistance Act, assisting individuals seeking to file 13        a motion to vacate and expunge under this subsection 14        may file motions to vacate and expunge with the Chief 15        Judge of a judicial circuit or any judge of the circuit 16        designated by the Chief Judge, and the motion may 17        include more than one individual.18        (4) Any State's Attorney may file a motion to vacate 19    and expunge a conviction for a Class 4 felony violation of 20    prostitution. Motions to vacate and expunge under this 21    subsection (j) may be filed with the circuit court, Chief 22    Judge of a judicial circuit, or any judge of the circuit 23    court designated by the Chief Judge, and may include more 24    than one individual. When considering the motion to vacate 25    and expunge, a court shall consider the following reasons:26            (A) the reasons to retain the records provided by   HB1836 Enrolled- 67 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        law enforcement;2            (B) the petitioner's age;3            (C) the petitioner's age at the time of offense;4            (D) the time since the conviction; and5            (E) the specific adverse consequences if denied.6        If the State's Attorney files a motion to vacate and 7    expunge records for felony prostitution convictions 8    pursuant to this Section, the State's Attorney shall 9    notify the Prisoner Review Board within 30 days of the 10    filing. If a motion to vacate and expunge is granted, the 11    records shall be expunged in accordance with subparagraph 12    (d)(9)(A) of this Section.13        (5) In the public interest, the State's Attorney of a 14    county has standing to file motions to vacate and expunge 15    pursuant to this Section in the circuit court with 16    jurisdiction over the underlying conviction.17        (6) The Illinois State Police shall allow a person to 18    a use the access and review process, established in the 19    Illinois State Police, for verifying that his or her 20    records relating to felony prostitution eligible under 21    this Section have been expunged.22        (7) No conviction vacated pursuant to this Section 23    shall serve as the basis for damages for time unjustly 24    served as provided in the Court of Claims Act.25        (8) Effect of Expungement. A person's right to expunge 26    an expungeable offense shall not be limited under this   HB1836 Enrolled- 68 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    Section. The effect of an order of expungement shall be to 2    restore the person to the status he or she occupied before 3    the arrest, charge, or conviction.4        (9) Information. The Illinois State Police shall post 5    general information on its website about the expungement 6    or sealing process described in this subsection (j).7    (k) Automatic Sealing. 8        (1) Applicability. Notwithstanding any other provision 9    of this Act, and cumulative with any rights to expungement 10    or sealing of criminal records, this subsection authorizes 11    the automatic sealing of criminal records of adults and of 12    minors prosecuted as adults. Any duties imposed upon the 13    Illinois State Police by this Act are subject to 14    appropriations being made for that purpose to the State 15    Police Services Fund. Any duties imposed upon circuit 16    clerks by this Act are subject to appropriations being 17    made for that purpose to the Circuit Court Clerk Operation 18    and Administrative Fund.19        (2) Beginning January 1, 2029, records created on or 20    after January 1, 1970 that meet the eligibility criteria 21    in paragraph (k)(3) and timing criteria in paragraph 22    (k)(4) or (k)(5) shall be automatically sealed without the 23    filing of a petition. The Illinois State Police shall 24    identify eligible records, automatically seal eligible 25    records, and provide an electronic notice to circuit 26    clerks, by means of the applicable e-filing system.  HB1836 Enrolled- 69 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        Commencing January 1, 2029, the Illinois State Police 2    shall, at least quarterly, seal all records identified as 3    subject to automatic sealing in paragraph (k)(3) and 4    meeting time requirements under paragraph (k)(5). At least 5    quarterly, the Illinois State Police shall electronically 6    notify each circuit court of all previously unidentified 7    records originating in that county for which a record is 8    subject to automatic sealing pursuant to this subsection.9        Upon receipt of notice from the Illinois State Police, 10    circuit clerks shall seal records as that term is defined 11    in subsection (a)(1)(K)(ii). For records held 12    electronically, circuit clerks shall seal records within 13    90 days of notice from the Illinois State Police. For 14    records not held electronically, circuit clerks shall 15    ensure that the individual's name is obliterated from the 16    official index required to be kept by the circuit court 17    clerk under Section 16 of the Clerks of Courts Act and 18    shall also ensure that the permanent record, as defined by 19    the Supreme Court, is sealed as defined in subsection 20    (a)(1)(K)(ii) before anyone not authorized by law is able 21    to access the physical records.22        For all records created before January 1, 2029, the 23    following timelines shall apply:24            (A) Records created prior to January 1, 2029 but 25        on or after July 1, 2005 shall be identified and sealed 26        by the Illinois State Police, with notice provided to   HB1836 Enrolled- 70 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        circuit clerks by means of the applicable e-filing 2        system, by January 1, 2030. Circuit clerks shall seal 3        records in accordance with the procedures established 4        in this Section by January 1, 2031.5            (B) Records created prior to July 1, 2005 but on or 6        after July 1, 1990 shall be identified and sealed by 7        the Illinois State Police, with notice provided to 8        circuit clerks by means of the applicable e-filing 9        system, by January 1, 2031. Circuit clerks shall seal 10        records in accordance with the procedures established 11        in this Section by January 1, 2032.12            (C) Records created prior to July 1, 1990 but on or 13        after July 1, 1970 shall be identified and sealed by 14        the Illinois State Police, with notice provided to 15        circuit clerks by means of the applicable e-filing 16        system, by January 1, 2032. Circuit clerks shall seal 17        records in accordance with the procedures established 18        in this Section by January 1, 2034. 19        (3) Records listed in subsection (c)(2) are eligible 20    for automatic record sealing unless excluded by subsection 21    (a)(3) or in this paragraph (3):22            (A) Records are not eligible for automatic sealing 23        while the subject of the record is serving a sentence, 24        order of supervision, or order of qualified probation 25        for a criminal offense in this State. Records are not 26        eligible for automatic sealing if the subject of the   HB1836 Enrolled- 71 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        record has pending filed charges. For the purposes of 2        determining if a charge is pending, if the Illinois 3        State Police is otherwise unable to determine 4        disposition status, misdemeanor charges shall not be 5        considered pending if one year has elapsed since the 6        filing of charges and felony charges shall not be 7        considered pending if 7 years have elapsed since the 8        filing of charges.9            (B) Records of conviction for offenses included in 10        Article 9 or 11 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 11        Criminal Code of 2012, for felonies designated as 12        Class X, and for felonies that require public 13        registration under the Sex Offender Registration Act 14        are not eligible for automatic sealing. 15        Notwithstanding this subparagraph, offenses included 16        in Section 11-14 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 17        Criminal Code of 2012 are eligible for automatic 18        sealing. A conviction of a crime of violence, as that 19        term is defined in Section 20 of the Drug Court 20        Treatment Act, is not eligible for automatic sealing. 21        A conviction of trafficking in persons, involuntary 22        servitude, or involuntary sexual servitude of a minor, 23        a conviction of organized retail crime, a conviction 24        of robbery, a conviction of vehicular hijacking, a 25        conviction of burglary that is a Class 1 or 2 felony, 26        or a conviction of residential burglary, as those   HB1836 Enrolled- 72 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        terms are used in Sections 10-9, 16-25.1, 18-1, 18-3, 2        19-1, and 19-3 of the Criminal Code of 2012, is not 3        eligible for automatic sealing. Convictions requiring 4        public registration under the Arsonist Registration 5        Act or the Murderer and Violent Offender Against Youth 6        Registration Act are not eligible for automatic 7        sealing until the petitioner is no longer required to 8        register under the relevant Act.9            (C) Records with the same case number as a 10        conviction listed in subparagraph (B) are not eligible 11        for automatic sealing.12            (D) Felony conviction records are not eligible for 13        automatic sealing until all felony conviction records 14        eligible for automatic sealing for the subject of the 15        record have met the time requirements in paragraph 16        (5). 17        (4) Automatic Sealing of Nonconviction Records. 18    Arrests or charges not initiated by arrest resulting in 19    acquittal or dismissal, except as excluded by subsection 20    (a)(3)(B), that occur on or after January 1, 2029 shall be 21    sealed immediately after entry of the final disposition of 22    a case, except as provided in subsection (k)(3)(C). Upon 23    entry of a disposition for an eligible record under this 24    paragraph, the defendant shall be informed by the court 25    that the defendant's eligible records will be immediately 26    sealed and the procedure for the immediate sealing of   HB1836 Enrolled- 73 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    these records. The court shall enter an order sealing the 2    record after entry of the final disposition of a case. 3    After sealing records pursuant to this paragraph, the 4    circuit court clerk must provide notice of sealing to the 5    Illinois State Police and to the arresting agency in a 6    form and manner prescribed by the Supreme Court. The 7    circuit clerk shall provide this notice within 30 days of 8    sealing the record and may do so electronically. An order 9    to immediately seal records shall be implemented in 10    conformance with paragraph (8). 11        (5) When Records are Subject to Automatic Sealing.12            (A) Records of arrest resulting in release without 13        charging and records of arrests or charges not 14        initiated by arrest resulting in acquittal, dismissal, 15        or conviction when the conviction was reversed or 16        vacated are subject to automatic sealing immediately.17            (B) Records of arrests or charges not initiated by 18        arrest resulting in orders of supervision, including 19        orders of supervision for municipal ordinance 20        violations, resulting in orders of qualified 21        probation, are subject to automatic sealing if 2 years 22        have elapsed since the termination of the order of 23        supervision or qualified probation.24            (C) Arrests or charges not initiated by arrest 25        resulting in misdemeanor convictions are subject to 26        automatic sealing if two years have elapsed since the   HB1836 Enrolled- 74 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        termination of the sentence associated with the 2        record.3            (D) Arrests or charges not initiated by arrest 4        resulting in convictions for felony offenses are 5        subject to automatic sealing if 3 years have elapsed 6        since the termination of the sentence associated with 7        the record.8            (E) For the purposes of determining if the 9        timelines in this paragraph (5) have been met, the 10        Illinois State Police shall consider records in its 11        possession and, in the absence of disposition or 12        sentence termination records, shall deem sentences 13        terminated based on the sentence or supervision term 14        length information in its possession. In the absence 15        of a known term length of probation or conditional 16        discharge, the Illinois State Police shall deem a term 17        completed if the maximum probation or conditional 18        discharge term length for the statutory class of the 19        offense has elapsed since the disposition date.20        (6) Notice. At least monthly, the circuit court clerk 21    shall provide notice to each arresting agency of all 22    records sealed under this subsection. The circuit court 23    clerk may provide this notice electronically.24        (7) Implementation. 25            (A) Upon notice of sealing provided by the circuit 26        court clerk, the arresting agency and any other agency   HB1836 Enrolled- 75 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        receiving notice of sealing shall seal the records 2        under the procedures in subsections (a)(1)(K) and 3        (d)(9)(C). 4            (B) In response to an inquiry for the sealed 5        records from anyone not authorized by law to access 6        the records, the court, the Illinois State Police, the 7        arresting agency, or the prosecuting agency receiving 8        the inquiry shall reply as it does in response to 9        inquiries when no records ever existed. 10            (C) Each circuit court that has sealed a record 11        shall make those records available to the subject of 12        the record, or an attorney representing the subject of 13        the record, without court order within 7 days. 14        (8) Upon request, the circuit court clerk shall 15    provide disposition information for any record sealed 16    pursuant to this subsection to the Illinois State Police, 17    the arresting agency, the State's Attorney, or prosecutor 18    that prosecuted the offense. If the Illinois State Police, 19    arresting agency, State's Attorney, or prosecutor that 20    prosecuted the offense determine a record has been 21    improperly sealed pursuant to this subsection, the 22    Illinois State Police, arresting agency, State's Attorney, 23    or prosecutor that prosecuted the offense may file a 24    petition to unseal the record with the court that entered 25    the original record. If the court determines the record 26    was improperly sealed, the court shall enter an order   HB1836 Enrolled- 76 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    unsealing the record.2        (9) Records sealed under this subsection shall be used 3    and disseminated by the Illinois State Police only as 4    required or authorized by a federal or State law, rule, or 5    regulation that requires inquiry into and release of 6    criminal records. The Department of Corrections shall have 7    access to all sealed records of the Illinois State Police 8    pertaining to individuals committed or confined within or 9    sentenced to a term of imprisonment within a correctional 10    institution or facility.11        (10) The Illinois State Police shall allow a person to 12    use the access and review process, established by the 13    Illinois State Police, for verifying that the person's 14    records eligible under this subsection have been sealed. 15    As part of the access and review process, upon request, 16    the Illinois State Police shall provide the subject of the 17    record written confirmation that the record was sealed 18    under this subsection.19        (11) An individual may challenge the individual's 20    record and request corrections, including the sealing of 21    records eligible under this subsection, by completing and 22    submitting a record challenge form to the Illinois State 23    Police. The Illinois State Police shall automatically seal 24    all records identified as eligible under this subsection 25    based on the access and review process. The Illinois State 26    Police shall include any records identified as eligible   HB1836 Enrolled- 77 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    under this process in the next electronic notification of 2    the circuit court in which the case originated. The 3    Illinois State Police shall render a final administrative 4    decision with respect to the record challenge, which shall 5    be subject to administrative appeal procedures established 6    by the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority.7        (12) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 8    restrict or modify an individual's right to have that 9    individual's records expunged or sealed except as 10    otherwise may be provided in this Act or diminish or 11    abrogate any rights or remedies otherwise available to the 12    individual.13        (13) The State or the county, or an official or 14    employee of the State or the county acting in the course of 15    the official's or employee's duties, is not liable for an 16    injury or loss a person might receive due to an act or 17    omission of a person in the commission of the person's 18    duties under this Act, except for willful, wanton 19    misconduct or gross negligence on the part of the 20    governmental unit or on the part of the official or 21    employee.22    (l) Municipal ordinance violations and Class C 23misdemeanors. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act 24to the contrary and cumulative with any rights to expungement 25of criminal records, this subsection requires the sealing of 26criminal records of municipal ordinance violations and Class C   HB1836 Enrolled- 78 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1misdemeanors without petition. Beginning January 1, 2028, and 2on January 1 and July 1 of each year thereafter, circuit court 3clerks shall seal any criminal records of arrests or charges 4not initiated by arrest resulting in charges or convictions 5for municipal ordinance violations or Class C misdemeanors if 6one year has elapsed since the case was closed as designated by 7the Supreme Court.8(Source: P.A. 103-35, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 9103-609, eff. 7-1-24; 103-755, eff. 8-2-24; 103-1071, eff. 107-1-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 9-17-25.) 11    (20 ILCS 2630/5.3 new)12    Sec. 5.3. Illinois Clean Slate Task Force.13    (a) There is created the Illinois Clean Slate Task Force 14to monitor the development of processes for sealing criminal 15records without petition, to create a plan for the 16implementation of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 17Assembly, and to monitor implementation.18    (b) The Task Force shall be composed of the following 19members:20        (1) The Director of the Illinois State Police or the 21    Director's designee.22        (2) The Director of the Administrative Office of the 23    Illinois Courts or the Director's designee.24        (3) A representative appointed by the Supreme Court of 25    Illinois.  HB1836 Enrolled- 79 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        (4) A representative of an association representing 2    sheriffs, appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of 3    Representatives.4        (5) A representative of an association representing 5    State's Attorneys, appointed by Minority Leader of the 6    Senate. 7        (6) The Executive Director of the Illinois Sentencing 8    Policy Advisory Council or the Executive Director's 9    designee.10        (7) Three circuit court clerks appointed by the 11    Governor, or the clerks' designees, one of whom represents 12    a county with a population equal to or greater than 13    3,000,000, one of whom represents a population equal to or 14    greater than 250,000 and less than 3,000,000, and one of 15    whom represents a population under 250,000.16        (8) Two representatives from organizations that 17    advocate for currently or formerly incarcerated people, 18    one appointed by the Speaker of the House of 19    Representatives and one appointed by the Senate President.20        (9) Two practitioners who represent people petitioning 21    for record sealing, one appointed by the Speaker of the 22    House of Representatives and one appointed by the Senate 23    President.24        (10) One member appointed by the Speaker of the House 25    of Representatives.26        (11) One member appointed by the House Minority   HB1836 Enrolled- 80 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    Leader.2        (12) One member appointed by the Senate President.3        (13) One member appointed by the Senate Minority 4    Leader.5        (14) Two members of the public with a criminal record 6    appointed by the Lieutenant Governor.7    (c) Co-chairpersons of the Task Force shall be elected 8from among the members of the Task Force by a majority vote of 9the Task Force. All appointments must be made under this 10Section within 60 days after the effective date of this 11amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, and the first 12meeting must be held within 90 days after the effective date of 13this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. If a 14vacancy occurs in the Task Force membership, the vacancy shall 15be filled in the same manner as the original appointment for 16the remainder of the Task Force.17    (d) Task Force members shall serve without compensation.18    (e) The Task Force shall meet, either virtually or in 19person, at least 4 times each year. Each meeting, including 20the meeting required under subsection (c), shall be set by the 21Task Force co-chairpersons.22    (f) The Task Force shall review best practices, research, 23and case studies in other states that have passed automatic 24record change laws. The Task Force shall examine processes for 25communication between circuit court clerks, the Administrative 26Office of the Illinois Courts, and the Illinois State Police   HB1836 Enrolled- 81 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1for the purposes of record correction, notification of records 2eligible for automatic sealing, and record matching. The Task 3Force shall research opportunities for the improvement of the 4transmission of supervision termination and sentence 5termination information from circuit court clerks and the 6Illinois Department of Corrections to the Illinois State 7Police for the purposes of identifying records eligible for 8automatic sealing.9    (g) The Task Force shall produce and submit an annual 10report before June 30th of each year detailing progress toward 11implementation of its duties under this Section, 12recommendations to address challenges to implementation, and 13needed resources to the General Assembly.14    (h) The Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 15shall provide administrative and other support to the Task 16Force. The General Assembly may appropriate funds to the 17Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority for the 18purpose of funding the work of the Task Force or services 19provided under this Section.20    (i) The Task Force is dissolved 5 years after the 21effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 22Assembly.23    (j) This Section is repealed 6 years after the effective 24date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.  25    (20 ILCS 2630/13)  HB1836 Enrolled- 82 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    Sec. 13. Retention and release of sealed records. 2    (a) The Illinois State Police shall retain records sealed 3under subsection (c) or (e-5) of Section 5.2 or impounded 4under subparagraph (B) or (B-5) of paragraph (9) of subsection 5(d) of Section 5.2 and shall release them only as authorized by 6this Act. Felony records sealed under subsection (c) or (e-5) 7of Section 5.2 or impounded under subparagraph (B) or (B-5) of 8paragraph (9) of subsection (d) of Section 5.2 shall be used 9and disseminated by the Illinois State Police only as 10otherwise specifically required or authorized by a federal or 11State law, rule, or regulation that requires inquiry into and 12release of criminal records, including, but not limited to, 13subsection (A) of Section 3 of this Act. However, all requests 14for records that have been expunged, sealed, and impounded and 15the use of those records are subject to the provisions of 16Section 2-103 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. Upon 17conviction for any offense, the Department of Corrections 18shall have access to all sealed records of the Illinois State 19Police pertaining to that individual.20    (b) Notwithstanding the foregoing, all sealed or impounded 21records are subject to inspection and use by the court and 22inspection and use by law enforcement agencies and State's 23Attorneys or other prosecutors in carrying out the duties of 24their offices. 25    (c) The sealed or impounded records maintained under 26subsection (a) are exempt from disclosure under the Freedom of   HB1836 Enrolled- 83 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1Information Act.2    (d) The Illinois State Police shall commence the sealing 3of records of felony arrests and felony convictions pursuant 4to the provisions of subsection (c) of Section 5.2 of this Act 5no later than one year from the date that funds have been made 6available for purposes of establishing the technologies 7necessary to implement the changes made by this amendatory Act 8of the 93rd General Assembly. 9(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 10    (20 ILCS 2630/14)11    Sec. 14. Expungement Backlog Accountability Law.12    (a) On or before August 1 of each year, the Illinois State 13Police shall report to the Governor, the Attorney General, the 14Office of the State Appellate Defender, and both houses of the 15General Assembly the following information for the previous 16fiscal year:17        (1) the number of petitions to expunge received by the 18    Illinois State Police;19        (2) the number of petitions to expunge to which the 20    Illinois State Police objected pursuant to subdivision 21    (d)(5)(B) of Section 5.2 of this Act;22        (3) the number of petitions to seal records received 23    by the Illinois State Police;24        (4) the number of petitions to seal records to which 25    the Illinois State Police objected pursuant to subdivision   HB1836 Enrolled- 84 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    (d)(5)(B) of Section 5.2 of this Act;2        (5) the number of orders to expunge received by the 3    Illinois State Police;4        (6) the number of orders to expunge to which the 5    Illinois State Police successfully filed a motion to 6    vacate, modify or reconsider under paragraph (12) of 7    subsection (d) of Section 5.2 of this Act;8        (7) the number of orders to expunge records entered by 9    the Illinois State Police;10        (8) the number of orders to seal records received by 11    the Illinois State Police;12        (9) the number of orders to seal records to which the 13    Illinois State Police successfully filed a motion to 14    vacate, modify or reconsider under paragraph (12) of 15    subsection (d) of Section 5.2 of this Act;16        (10) the number of orders to seal records entered by 17    the Illinois State Police;18        (11) the amount of fees received by the Illinois State 19    Police pursuant to subdivision (d)(10) of Section 5.2 of 20    this Act and deposited into the State Police Services 21    Fund;22        (12) the number of orders to expunge or to seal 23    records received by the Illinois State Police that have 24    not been entered as of June 30 of the previous fiscal 25    year; .26        (13) the total number of records sealed pursuant to   HB1836 Enrolled- 85 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    automated sealing under subsection (k) of Section 5.2; 2        (14) the number of conviction records sealed pursuant 3    to automated sealing under subsection (k) of Section 5.2; 4        (15) the number of conviction records sealed pursuant 5    to automated sealing under subsection (k) of Section 5.2 6    by misdemeanor or felony class; and 7        (16) the number of records sealed pursuant to 8    automated sealing under subsection (k) of Section 5.2 by 9    county. 10    (b) The information reported under this Section shall be 11made available to the public, at the time it is reported, on 12the official web site of the Illinois State Police. 13    (c) Upon request of a State's Attorney or the Attorney 14General, the Illinois State Police shall provide within 90 15days a list of all orders to expunge or seal with which the 16Illinois State Police has not yet complied. This list shall 17include the date of the order, the name of the petitioner, the 18case number, and a detailed statement of the basis for 19non-compliance. 20(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 21    Section 10. The Juvenile Court Act of 1987 is amended by 22changing Sections 1-8 and 5-901 as follows: 23    (705 ILCS 405/1-8)24    Sec. 1-8. Confidentiality and accessibility of juvenile   HB1836 Enrolled- 86 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1court records. 2    (A) A juvenile adjudication shall never be considered a 3conviction nor shall an adjudicated individual be considered a 4criminal. Unless expressly allowed by law, a juvenile 5adjudication shall not operate to impose upon the individual 6any of the civil disabilities ordinarily imposed by or 7resulting from conviction. Unless expressly allowed by law, 8adjudications shall not prejudice or disqualify the individual 9in any civil service application or appointment, from holding 10public office, or from receiving any license granted by public 11authority. All juvenile court records which have not been 12expunged are sealed and may never be disclosed to the general 13public or otherwise made widely available. Sealed juvenile 14court records may be obtained only under this Section and 15Section 1-7 and Part 9 of Article V of this Act, when their use 16is needed for good cause and with an order from the juvenile 17court. Inspection and copying of juvenile court records 18relating to a minor who is the subject of a proceeding under 19this Act shall be restricted to the following:20        (1) The minor who is the subject of record, the 21    minor's parents, guardian, and counsel.22        (2) Law enforcement officers and law enforcement 23    agencies when such information is essential to executing 24    an arrest or search warrant or other compulsory process, 25    or to conducting an ongoing investigation or relating to a 26    minor who has been adjudicated delinquent and there has   HB1836 Enrolled- 87 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    been a previous finding that the act which constitutes the 2    previous offense was committed in furtherance of criminal 3    activities by a criminal street gang.4        Before July 1, 1994, for the purposes of this Section, 5    "criminal street gang" means any ongoing organization, 6    association, or group of 3 or more persons, whether formal 7    or informal, having as one of its primary activities the 8    commission of one or more criminal acts and that has a 9    common name or common identifying sign, symbol, or 10    specific color apparel displayed, and whose members 11    individually or collectively engage in or have engaged in 12    a pattern of criminal activity.13        Beginning July 1, 1994, for purposes of this Section, 14    "criminal street gang" has the meaning ascribed to it in 15    Section 10 of the Illinois Streetgang Terrorism Omnibus 16    Prevention Act.17        (3) Judges, hearing officers, prosecutors, public 18    defenders, probation officers, social workers, or other 19    individuals assigned by the court to conduct a 20    pre-adjudication or pre-disposition investigation, and 21    individuals responsible for supervising or providing 22    temporary or permanent care and custody for minors under 23    the order of the juvenile court when essential to 24    performing their responsibilities.25        (4) Judges, federal, State, and local prosecutors, 26    public defenders, probation officers, and designated   HB1836 Enrolled- 88 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    staff:2            (a) in the course of a trial when institution of 3        criminal proceedings has been permitted or required 4        under Section 5-805;5            (b) when criminal proceedings have been permitted 6        or required under Section 5-805 and a minor is the 7        subject of a proceeding to determine the conditions of 8        pretrial release;9            (c) when criminal proceedings have been permitted 10        or required under Section 5-805 and a minor is the 11        subject of a pre-trial investigation, pre-sentence 12        investigation or fitness hearing, or proceedings on an 13        application for probation; or14            (d) when a minor becomes 18 years of age or older, 15        and is the subject of criminal proceedings, including 16        a hearing to determine the conditions of pretrial 17        release, a pre-trial investigation, a pre-sentence 18        investigation, a fitness hearing, or proceedings on an 19        application for probation.20        (5) Adult and Juvenile Prisoner Review Boards.21        (6) Authorized military personnel.22        (6.5) Employees of the federal government authorized 23    by law. 24        (7) Victims, their subrogees and legal 25    representatives; however, such persons shall have access 26    only to the name and address of the minor and information   HB1836 Enrolled- 89 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    pertaining to the disposition or alternative adjustment 2    plan of the juvenile court.3        (8) Persons engaged in bona fide research, with the 4    permission of the presiding judge of the juvenile court 5    and the chief executive of the agency that prepared the 6    particular records; provided that publication of such 7    research results in no disclosure of a minor's identity 8    and protects the confidentiality of the record.9        (9) The Secretary of State to whom the Clerk of the 10    Court shall report the disposition of all cases, as 11    required in Section 6-204 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 12    However, information reported relative to these offenses 13    shall be privileged and available only to the Secretary of 14    State, courts, and police officers.15        (10) The administrator of a bonafide substance abuse 16    student assistance program with the permission of the 17    presiding judge of the juvenile court.18        (11) Mental health professionals on behalf of the 19    Department of Corrections or the Department of Human 20    Services or prosecutors who are evaluating, prosecuting, 21    or investigating a potential or actual petition brought 22    under the Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act relating 23    to a person who is the subject of juvenile court records or 24    the respondent to a petition brought under the Sexually 25    Violent Persons Commitment Act, who is the subject of 26    juvenile court records sought. Any records and any   HB1836 Enrolled- 90 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    information obtained from those records under this 2    paragraph (11) may be used only in sexually violent 3    persons commitment proceedings.4        (12) (Blank). 5    (A-1) Findings and exclusions of paternity entered in 6proceedings occurring under Article II of this Act shall be 7disclosed, in a manner and form approved by the Presiding 8Judge of the Juvenile Court, to the Department of Healthcare 9and Family Services when necessary to discharge the duties of 10the Department of Healthcare and Family Services under Article 11X of the Illinois Public Aid Code. 12    (B) A minor who is the victim in a juvenile proceeding 13shall be provided the same confidentiality regarding 14disclosure of identity as the minor who is the subject of 15record.16    (C)(0.1) In cases where the records concern a pending 17juvenile court case, the requesting party seeking to inspect 18the juvenile court records shall provide actual notice to the 19attorney or guardian ad litem of the minor whose records are 20sought.21    (0.2) In cases where the juvenile court records concern a 22juvenile court case that is no longer pending, the requesting 23party seeking to inspect the juvenile court records shall 24provide actual notice to the minor or the minor's parent or 25legal guardian, and the matter shall be referred to the chief 26judge presiding over matters pursuant to this Act.  HB1836 Enrolled- 91 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1    (0.3) In determining whether juvenile court records should 2be made available for inspection and whether inspection should 3be limited to certain parts of the file, the court shall 4consider the minor's interest in confidentiality and 5rehabilitation over the requesting party's interest in 6obtaining the information. The State's Attorney, the minor, 7and the minor's parents, guardian, and counsel shall at all 8times have the right to examine court files and records.9    (0.4) Any records obtained in violation of this Section 10shall not be admissible in any criminal or civil proceeding, 11or operate to disqualify a minor from subsequently holding 12public office, or operate as a forfeiture of any public 13benefit, right, privilege, or right to receive any license 14granted by public authority. 15    (D) Pending or following any adjudication of delinquency 16for any offense defined in Sections 11-1.20 through 11-1.60 or 1712-13 through 12-16 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 18Criminal Code of 2012, the victim of any such offense shall 19receive the rights set out in Sections 4 and 6 of the Rights of 20Crime Victims and Witnesses Act; and the juvenile who is the 21subject of the adjudication, notwithstanding any other 22provision of this Act, shall be treated as an adult for the 23purpose of affording such rights to the victim.24    (E) Nothing in this Section shall affect the right of a 25Civil Service Commission or appointing authority of the 26federal government, or any state, county, or municipality   HB1836 Enrolled- 92 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1examining the character and fitness of an applicant for 2employment with a law enforcement agency, correctional 3institution, or fire department to ascertain whether that 4applicant was ever adjudicated to be a delinquent minor and, 5if so, to examine the records of disposition or evidence which 6were made in proceedings under this Act.7    (F) Following any adjudication of delinquency for a crime 8which would be a felony if committed by an adult, or following 9any adjudication of delinquency for a violation of Section 1024-1, 24-3, 24-3.1, or 24-5 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 11Criminal Code of 2012, the State's Attorney shall ascertain 12whether the minor respondent is enrolled in school and, if so, 13shall provide a copy of the dispositional order to the 14principal or chief administrative officer of the school. 15Access to the dispositional order shall be limited to the 16principal or chief administrative officer of the school and 17any school counselor designated by the principal or chief 18administrative officer.19    (G) Nothing contained in this Act prevents the sharing or 20disclosure of information or records relating or pertaining to 21juveniles subject to the provisions of the Serious Habitual 22Offender Comprehensive Action Program when that information is 23used to assist in the early identification and treatment of 24habitual juvenile offenders.25    (H) When a court hearing a proceeding under Article II of 26this Act becomes aware that an earlier proceeding under   HB1836 Enrolled- 93 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1Article II had been heard in a different county, that court 2shall request, and the court in which the earlier proceedings 3were initiated shall transmit, an authenticated copy of the 4juvenile court record, including all documents, petitions, and 5orders filed and the minute orders, transcript of proceedings, 6and docket entries of the court.7    (I) The Clerk of the Circuit Court shall report to the 8Illinois State Police, in the form and manner required by the 9Illinois State Police, the final disposition of each minor who 10has been arrested or taken into custody before the minor's 1118th birthday for those offenses required to be reported under 12Section 5 of the Criminal Identification Act. Information 13reported to the Illinois State Police under this Section may 14be maintained with records that the Illinois State Police 15files under Section 2.1 of the Criminal Identification Act. 16Upon request, the circuit court clerk shall provide the 17disposition information for any case or record required to be 18reported to the Illinois State Police under Section 2.1 or 5 of 19the Criminal Identification Act. 20    (J) The changes made to this Section by Public Act 98-61 21apply to juvenile law enforcement records of a minor who has 22been arrested or taken into custody on or after January 1, 2014 23(the effective date of Public Act 98-61). 24    (K) Willful violation of this Section is a Class C 25misdemeanor and each violation is subject to a fine of $1,000. 26This subsection (K) shall not apply to the person who is the   HB1836 Enrolled- 94 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1subject of the record.2    (L) A person convicted of violating this Section is liable 3for damages in the amount of $1,000 or actual damages, 4whichever is greater. 5(Source: P.A. 102-197, eff. 7-30-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 6102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-379, eff. 77-28-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 8    (705 ILCS 405/5-901)9    Sec. 5-901. Court file. 10    (1) The court file with respect to proceedings under this 11Article shall consist of the petitions, pleadings, victim 12impact statements, process, service of process, orders, writs 13and docket entries reflecting hearings held and judgments and 14decrees entered by the court. The court file shall be kept 15separate from other records of the court.16        (a) The file, including information identifying the 17    victim or alleged victim of any sex offense, shall be 18    disclosed only to the following parties when necessary for 19    discharge of their official duties:20            (i) A judge of the circuit court and members of the 21        staff of the court designated by the judge;22            (ii) Parties to the proceedings and their 23        attorneys;24            (iii) Victims and their attorneys, except in cases 25        of multiple victims of sex offenses in which case the   HB1836 Enrolled- 95 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        information identifying the nonrequesting victims 2        shall be redacted;3            (iv) Probation officers, law enforcement officers 4        or prosecutors or their staff;5            (v) Adult and juvenile Prisoner Review Boards.6        (b) The Court file redacted to remove any information 7    identifying the victim or alleged victim of any sex 8    offense shall be disclosed only to the following parties 9    when necessary for discharge of their official duties:10            (i) Authorized military personnel;11            (ii) Persons engaged in bona fide research, with 12        the permission of the judge of the juvenile court and 13        the chief executive of the agency that prepared the 14        particular recording: provided that publication of 15        such research results in no disclosure of a minor's 16        identity and protects the confidentiality of the 17        record;18            (iii) The Secretary of State to whom the Clerk of 19        the Court shall report the disposition of all cases, 20        as required in Section 6-204 or Section 6-205.1 of the 21        Illinois Vehicle Code. However, information reported 22        relative to these offenses shall be privileged and 23        available only to the Secretary of State, courts, and 24        police officers;25            (iv) The administrator of a bonafide substance 26        abuse student assistance program with the permission   HB1836 Enrolled- 96 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        of the presiding judge of the juvenile court;2            (v) Any individual, or any public or private 3        agency or institution, having custody of the juvenile 4        under court order or providing educational, medical or 5        mental health services to the juvenile or a 6        court-approved advocate for the juvenile or any 7        placement provider or potential placement provider as 8        determined by the court.9    (2) (Reserved). 10    (3) A minor who is the victim or alleged victim in a 11juvenile proceeding shall be provided the same confidentiality 12regarding disclosure of identity as the minor who is the 13subject of record. Information identifying victims and alleged 14victims of sex offenses, shall not be disclosed or open to 15public inspection under any circumstances. Nothing in this 16Section shall prohibit the victim or alleged victim of any sex 17offense from voluntarily disclosing this identity.18    (4) Relevant information, reports and records shall be 19made available to the Department of Juvenile Justice when a 20juvenile offender has been placed in the custody of the 21Department of Juvenile Justice.22    (4.5) Relevant information, reports and records, held by 23the Department of Juvenile Justice, including social 24investigation, psychological and medical records, of any 25juvenile offender, shall be made available to any county 26juvenile detention facility upon written request by the   HB1836 Enrolled- 97 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1Superintendent or Director of that juvenile detention 2facility, to the Chief Records Officer of the Department of 3Juvenile Justice where the subject youth is or was in the 4custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice and is 5subsequently ordered to be held in a county juvenile detention 6facility.7    (5) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (5), 8juvenile court records shall not be made available to the 9general public but may be inspected by representatives of 10agencies, associations and news media or other properly 11interested persons by general or special order of the court. 12The State's Attorney, the minor, the minor's parents, guardian 13and counsel shall at all times have the right to examine court 14files and records.15        (a) The court shall allow the general public to have 16    access to the name, address, and offense of a minor who is 17    adjudicated a delinquent minor under this Act under either 18    of the following circumstances:19            (i) The adjudication of delinquency was based upon 20        the minor's commission of first degree murder, attempt 21        to commit first degree murder, aggravated criminal 22        sexual assault, or criminal sexual assault; or23            (ii) The court has made a finding that the minor 24        was at least 13 years of age at the time the act was 25        committed and the adjudication of delinquency was 26        based upon the minor's commission of: (A) an act in   HB1836 Enrolled- 98 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        furtherance of the commission of a felony as a member 2        of or on behalf of a criminal street gang, (B) an act 3        involving the use of a firearm in the commission of a 4        felony, (C) an act that would be a Class X felony 5        offense under or the minor's second or subsequent 6        Class 2 or greater felony offense under the Cannabis 7        Control Act if committed by an adult, (D) an act that 8        would be a second or subsequent offense under Section 9        402 of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act if 10        committed by an adult, (E) an act that would be an 11        offense under Section 401 of the Illinois Controlled 12        Substances Act if committed by an adult, or (F) an act 13        that would be an offense under the Methamphetamine 14        Control and Community Protection Act if committed by 15        an adult.16        (b) The court shall allow the general public to have 17    access to the name, address, and offense of a minor who is 18    at least 13 years of age at the time the offense is 19    committed and who is convicted, in criminal proceedings 20    permitted or required under Section 5-805, under either of 21    the following circumstances:22            (i) The minor has been convicted of first degree 23        murder, attempt to commit first degree murder, 24        aggravated criminal sexual assault, or criminal sexual 25        assault,26            (ii) The court has made a finding that the minor   HB1836 Enrolled- 99 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1        was at least 13 years of age at the time the offense 2        was committed and the conviction was based upon the 3        minor's commission of: (A) an offense in furtherance 4        of the commission of a felony as a member of or on 5        behalf of a criminal street gang, (B) an offense 6        involving the use of a firearm in the commission of a 7        felony, (C) a Class X felony offense under the 8        Cannabis Control Act or a second or subsequent Class 2 9        or greater felony offense under the Cannabis Control 10        Act, (D) a second or subsequent offense under Section 11        402 of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, (E) an 12        offense under Section 401 of the Illinois Controlled 13        Substances Act, or (F) an offense under the 14        Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act.15    (6) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to limit 16the use of an adjudication of delinquency as evidence in any 17juvenile or criminal proceeding, where it would otherwise be 18admissible under the rules of evidence, including, but not 19limited to, use as impeachment evidence against any witness, 20including the minor if the minor testifies.21    (7) Nothing in this Section shall affect the right of a 22Civil Service Commission or appointing authority examining the 23character and fitness of an applicant for a position as a law 24enforcement officer to ascertain whether that applicant was 25ever adjudicated to be a delinquent minor and, if so, to 26examine the records or evidence which were made in proceedings   HB1836 Enrolled- 100 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1under this Act.2    (8) Following any adjudication of delinquency for a crime 3which would be a felony if committed by an adult, or following 4any adjudication of delinquency for a violation of Section 524-1, 24-3, 24-3.1, or 24-5 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 6Criminal Code of 2012, the State's Attorney shall ascertain 7whether the minor respondent is enrolled in school and, if so, 8shall provide a copy of the sentencing order to the principal 9or chief administrative officer of the school. Access to such 10juvenile records shall be limited to the principal or chief 11administrative officer of the school and any school counselor 12designated by the principal or chief administrative officer.13    (9) Nothing contained in this Act prevents the sharing or 14disclosure of information or records relating or pertaining to 15juveniles subject to the provisions of the Serious Habitual 16Offender Comprehensive Action Program when that information is 17used to assist in the early identification and treatment of 18habitual juvenile offenders.19    (10) (Reserved). 20    (11) The Clerk of the Circuit Court shall report to the 21Illinois State Police, in the form and manner required by the 22Illinois State Police, the final disposition of each minor who 23has been arrested or taken into custody before the minor's 2418th birthday for those offenses required to be reported under 25Section 5 of the Criminal Identification Act. Information 26reported to the Illinois State Police under this Section may   HB1836 Enrolled- 101 -LRB104 08084 RLC 18130 b1be maintained with records that the Illinois State Police 2files under Section 2.1 of the Criminal Identification Act. 3Upon request, the circuit court clerk shall provide the 4disposition information for any case or record required to be 5reported to the Illinois State Police under Section 2.1 or 5 of 6the Criminal Identification Act. 7    (12) Information or records may be disclosed to the 8general public when the court is conducting hearings under 9Section 5-805 or 5-810.10    (13) The changes made to this Section by Public Act 98-61 11apply to juvenile court records of a minor who has been 12arrested or taken into custody on or after January 1, 2014 (the 13effective date of Public Act 98-61). 14(Source: P.A. 102-197, eff. 7-30-21; 102-320, eff. 8-6-21; 15102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-22, eff. 168-8-23.) 17    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 18changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 19that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 20represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 21not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 22made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 23Public Act.